Missouri, session 2026, HB3487.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 128.345, 128.346, and 128.348, RSMo, are repealed and eleven
2 new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 128.345, 128.346, 128.348,
3 128.481, 128.482, 128.483, 128.484, 128.485, 128.486, 128.487, and 128.488, to read as
4 follows:
128.345. 1. All references in sections 128.451 to 128.458 to counties, voting districts
2 (VTD), and tract-blocks (Block) mean those counties, voting districts (VTD), and tract-blocks
3 (Block) as reported to the state by the United States Bureau of the Census for the 2010 census.
4 2. All references in sections 128.461 to [128.478] 128.488to counties, voting districts
5 (VTD), and tract-blocks (Block) mean those counties, voting districts (VTD), and tract-blocks
6 (Block) as reported to the state by the United States Bureau of the Census for the 2020 census.
128.346. 1. The districts established by the provisions of sections 128.400 to 128.440
2 for the election of representatives to the Congress of the United States shall be effective
3 beginning with election to the 108th Congress and through the election of the 112th Congress.
4 2. The districts established by sections 128.451 to 128.458 for the election of
5 representatives to the Congress of the United States shall be effective beginning with the
6 election to the 113th Congress and through the election of the 117th Congress.
7 3. The districts established by sections 128.461 to 128.468 for the election of
8 representatives to the Congress of the United States shall be effective beginning with the
9 election to the 118th Congress and through the election of the 119th Congress.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3487 2
10 4. The districts established by sections 128.471 to 128.478 for the election of
11 representatives to the Congress of the United States shall be effective [beginning with] forthe
12 election of the 120th Congress.
13 5. The district established by sections 128.481 to 128.488 for the election of
14 representatives to the Congress of the United States shall be effective beginning with the
15 election of the 121st Congress.
128.348. 1. Effective with the election for the 113th Congress and through the
2 election of the 117th Congress, the state of Missouri shall consist of eight congressional
3 districts.
4 2. Effective with the election of the 118th Congress, the state of Missouri shall consist
5 of eight congressional districts.
6 3. Effective with the election of the 120th Congress, the state of Missouri shall consist
7 of eight congressional districts.
8 4. Effective with the election of the 121st Congress, the state of Missouri shall
9 consist of eight congressional districts.
10 [4.] 5. The legal voters of each district shall elect one member of Congress of the
11 United States.
128.481. The first congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: St. Louis City MO
3 County: St. Louis MO
4 VTD: AP001
5 VTD: AP002
6 VTD: AP003
7 VTD: AP004
8 VTD: AP005
9 VTD: AP006
10 VTD: AP007
11 VTD: AP008
12 VTD: AP009
13 VTD: AP010
14 VTD: AP011
15 VTD: AP012
16 VTD: AP013
17 VTD: AP014
18 VTD: AP015
19 VTD: AP016
20 VTD: AP017

HB 3487 3
21 VTD: AP018
22 VTD: AP019
23 VTD: AP020
24 VTD: AP021
25 VTD: AP022
26 VTD: AP023
27 VTD: AP024
28 VTD: AP025
29 VTD: AP026
30 VTD: AP027
31 VTD: AP028
32 VTD: AP029
33 VTD: AP030
34 VTD: AP031
35 VTD: AP033
36 VTD: AP034
37 VTD: AP035
38 VTD: AP036
39 VTD: AP037
40 VTD: AP038
41 VTD: AP039
42 VTD: AP040
43 VTD: AP042
44 VTD: AP043
45 VTD: AP044
46 VTD: AP045
47 VTD: AP046
48 VTD: AP047
49 VTD: AP048
50 VTD: AP049
51 VTD: AP050
52 VTD: AP051
53 VTD: AP200
54 VTD: AP203
55 VTD: AP206
56 VTD: AP207
57 VTD: AP208

HB 3487 4
58 VTD: AP211
59 VTD: AP214
60 VTD: AP215
61 VTD: AP216
62 VTD: AP217
63 VTD: AP218
64 VTD: AP225
65 VTD: AP230
66 VTD: AP232
67 VTD: AP233
68 VTD: AP237
69 VTD: CC012
70 VTD: CC013
71 VTD: CC022
72 VTD: CC038
73 VTD: CC048
74 Block: 291892155004011
75 VTD: CC051
76 VTD: CC057
77 VTD: CC205
78 VTD: CLA001
79 VTD: CLA002
80 VTD: CLA003
81 VTD: CLA004
82 Block: 291892165004005
83 Block: 291892165004006
84 Block: 291892165004007
85 Block: 291892165004008
86 Block: 291892165004009
87 Block: 291892165004010
88 Block: 291892165004011
89 Block: 291892165004012
90 Block: 291892165004013
91 Block: 291892165004014
92 Block: 291892165004015
93 Block: 291892165004016
94 Block: 291892165004017

HB 3487 5
95 Block: 291892165004018
96 Block: 291892165004019
97 Block: 291892165004020
98 Block: 291892165004022
99 Block: 291892165004023
100 Block: 291892165004024
101 Block: 291892165004025
102 Block: 291892165004026
103 VTD: CLA005
104 VTD: CLA008
105 VTD: CLA009
106 VTD: CLA010
107 VTD: CLA011
108 VTD: CLA013
109 Block: 291892165004021
110 VTD: CLA017
111 VTD: CLA019
112 VTD: CLA020
113 VTD: CLA021
114 VTD: CLA022
115 VTD: CLA023
116 VTD: CLA027
117 VTD: CLA029
118 VTD: CLA030
119 VTD: CLA031
120 VTD: CLA032
121 VTD: CLA035
122 VTD: CLA038
123 VTD: CLA039
124 VTD: CLA041
125 VTD: CLA043
126 VTD: CLA044
127 VTD: CLA046
128 VTD: CLA050
129 VTD: CLA051
130 VTD: CLA052
131 VTD: CLA200

HB 3487 6
132 VTD: CLA206
133 VTD: FER001
134 VTD: FER002
135 VTD: FER003
136 VTD: FER004
137 VTD: FER005
138 VTD: FER006
139 VTD: FER007
140 VTD: FER008
141 VTD: FER009
142 VTD: FER010
143 VTD: FER011
144 VTD: FER012
145 VTD: FER013
146 VTD: FER014
147 VTD: FER015
148 VTD: FER016
149 VTD: FER017
150 VTD: FER018
151 VTD: FER019
152 VTD: FER020
153 VTD: FER021
154 VTD: FER022
155 VTD: FER023
156 VTD: FER024
157 VTD: FER025
158 VTD: FER026
159 VTD: FER027
160 VTD: FER028
161 VTD: FER029
162 VTD: FER030
163 VTD: FER031
164 VTD: FER032
165 VTD: FER033
166 VTD: FER034
167 VTD: FER035
168 VTD: FER036

HB 3487 7
169 VTD: FER037
170 VTD: FER038
171 VTD: FER039
172 VTD: FER040
173 VTD: FER041
174 VTD: FER042
175 VTD: FER043
176 VTD: FER044
177 VTD: FER045
178 VTD: FER046
179 VTD: FER206
180 VTD: FER207
181 VTD: FER208
182 VTD: FLO001
183 VTD: FLO002
184 VTD: FLO003
185 VTD: FLO004
186 VTD: FLO005
187 VTD: FLO006
188 VTD: FLO007
189 VTD: FLO008
190 VTD: FLO009
191 VTD: FLO010
192 VTD: FLO011
193 VTD: FLO012
194 VTD: FLO013
195 VTD: FLO014
196 VTD: FLO015
197 VTD: FLO016
198 VTD: FLO017
199 VTD: FLO018
200 VTD: FLO019
201 VTD: FLO020
202 VTD: FLO021
203 VTD: FLO022
204 VTD: FLO023
205 VTD: FLO024

HB 3487 8
206 VTD: FLO025
207 VTD: FLO026
208 VTD: FLO027
209 VTD: FLO028
210 VTD: FLO029
211 VTD: FLO030
212 VTD: FLO031
213 VTD: FLO200
214 VTD: FLO201
215 VTD: FLO205
216 VTD: FLO207
217 VTD: GRA006
218 Block: 291892219001011
219 VTD: GRA007
220 Block: 291892198011012
221 Block: 291892198011013
222 Block: 291892198011014
223 Block: 291892198011020
224 Block: 291892198011021
225 Block: 291892198012012
226 Block: 291892198012013
227 Block: 291892198012015
228 Block: 291892198012016
229 VTD: GRA015
230 Block: 291892197005003
231 Block: 291892197005004
232 Block: 291892197005005
233 Block: 291892197005006
234 Block: 291892197005007
235 Block: 291892197005008
236 Block: 291892197005010
237 Block: 291892197005011
238 Block: 291892197005012
239 Block: 291892197005013
240 VTD: GRA016
241 VTD: GRA018
242 VTD: GRA019

HB 3487 9
243 Block: 291892197001024
244 Block: 291892197003006
245 Block: 291892197003007
246 Block: 291892197003008
247 Block: 291892197003009
248 Block: 291892197003010
249 Block: 291892197003011
250 Block: 291892197003012
251 Block: 291892197003013
252 Block: 291892197003014
253 Block: 291892197005002
254 Block: 291892197005014
255 Block: 291892197005015
256 Block: 291892198012001
257 Block: 291892198012002
258 Block: 291892198013017
259 VTD: GRA021
260 VTD: GRA022
261 VTD: GRA025
262 VTD: GRA033
263 Block: 291892199001000
264 Block: 291892199001001
265 Block: 291892199001002
266 Block: 291892199001003
267 Block: 291892199001004
268 Block: 291892199001005
269 Block: 291892199001006
270 Block: 291892199001008
271 Block: 291892199001009
272 VTD: GRA035
273 VTD: GRA039
274 VTD: GRA045
275 VTD: GRA202
276 VTD: HAD001
277 VTD: HAD002
278 VTD: HAD003
279 VTD: HAD004

HB 3487 10
280 VTD: HAD005
281 VTD: HAD006
282 VTD: HAD007
283 VTD: HAD008
284 VTD: HAD009
285 VTD: HAD010
286 VTD: HAD011
287 VTD: HAD012
288 VTD: HAD013
289 VTD: HAD014
290 VTD: HAD015
291 VTD: HAD016
292 VTD: HAD017
293 VTD: HAD018
294 VTD: HAD019
295 VTD: HAD020
296 VTD: HAD021
297 VTD: HAD022
298 VTD: HAD023
299 VTD: HAD024
300 VTD: HAD025
301 VTD: HAD026
302 VTD: HAD027
303 VTD: HAD028
304 VTD: HAD029
305 VTD: HAD030
306 VTD: HAD031
307 VTD: HAD032
308 VTD: HAD033
309 VTD: HAD034
310 VTD: HAD035
311 VTD: HAD200
312 VTD: JEF005
313 VTD: JEF006
314 VTD: JEF007
315 VTD: JEF008
316 VTD: JEF009

HB 3487 11
317 VTD: JEF010
318 VTD: JEF011
319 VTD: JEF012
320 VTD: JEF013
321 VTD: JEF014
322 VTD: JEF015
323 VTD: JEF016
324 VTD: JEF017
325 VTD: JEF018
326 VTD: JEF019
327 VTD: JEF020
328 VTD: JEF021
329 VTD: JEF022
330 VTD: JEF023
331 VTD: JEF024
332 VTD: JEF025
333 VTD: JEF026
334 VTD: JEF027
335 VTD: JEF028
336 VTD: JEF029
337 VTD: JEF030
338 VTD: JEF031
339 VTD: JEF202
340 VTD: LC001
341 VTD: LC002
342 VTD: LC003
343 VTD: LC004
344 VTD: LC005
345 VTD: LC006
346 VTD: LC007
347 VTD: LC008
348 VTD: LC009
349 VTD: LC010
350 VTD: LC011
351 VTD: LC012
352 VTD: LC013
353 VTD: LC014

HB 3487 12
354 VTD: LC015
355 VTD: LC016
356 VTD: LC017
357 VTD: LC018
358 VTD: LC019
359 VTD: LC020
360 VTD: LC021
361 VTD: LC022
362 VTD: LC023
363 VTD: LC024
364 VTD: LC025
365 VTD: LC026
366 VTD: LC027
367 VTD: LC028
368 VTD: LC029
369 VTD: LC030
370 VTD: LC031
371 VTD: LC032
372 VTD: LC033
373 VTD: LC200
374 VTD: LC203
375 VTD: LC204
376 VTD: LC209
377 VTD: MID001
378 VTD: MID002
379 VTD: MID003
380 VTD: MID004
381 VTD: MID005
382 VTD: MID006
383 VTD: MID007
384 VTD: MID008
385 VTD: MID009
386 VTD: MID010
387 VTD: MID011
388 VTD: MID012
389 VTD: MID013
390 VTD: MID014

HB 3487 13
391 VTD: MID015
392 VTD: MID016
393 VTD: MID017
394 VTD: MID018
395 VTD: MID019
396 VTD: MID020
397 VTD: MID021
398 VTD: MID022
399 VTD: MID023
400 VTD: MID024
401 VTD: MID025
402 VTD: MID026
403 VTD: MID027
404 VTD: MID028
405 VTD: MID029
406 VTD: MID030
407 VTD: MID031
408 VTD: MID032
409 VTD: MID033
410 VTD: MID034
411 VTD: MID035
412 VTD: MID036
413 VTD: MID037
414 VTD: MID038
415 VTD: MID039
416 VTD: MID040
417 VTD: MID041
418 VTD: MID042
419 VTD: MID043
420 VTD: MID044
421 VTD: MID045
422 VTD: MID046
423 VTD: MID047
424 VTD: MID048
425 VTD: MID049
426 VTD: MID050
427 VTD: MID051

HB 3487 14
428 VTD: MID052
429 VTD: MID053
430 VTD: MID054
431 VTD: MID055
432 VTD: MID056
433 VTD: MID057
434 VTD: MID058
435 VTD: MID059
436 VTD: MID060
437 VTD: MID061
438 VTD: MID200
439 VTD: MID201
440 VTD: MID202
441 VTD: MID204
442 VTD: NOR001
443 VTD: NOR002
444 VTD: NOR003
445 VTD: NOR004
446 VTD: NOR005
447 VTD: NOR006
448 VTD: NOR007
449 VTD: NOR008
450 VTD: NOR009
451 VTD: NOR010
452 VTD: NOR011
453 VTD: NOR012
454 VTD: NOR013
455 VTD: NOR014
456 VTD: NOR015
457 VTD: NOR016
458 VTD: NOR017
459 VTD: NOR018
460 VTD: NOR019
461 VTD: NOR020
462 VTD: NOR021
463 VTD: NOR022
464 VTD: NOR023

HB 3487 15
465 VTD: NOR024
466 VTD: NOR025
467 VTD: NOR026
468 VTD: NOR027
469 VTD: NOR028
470 VTD: NOR029
471 VTD: NOR030
472 VTD: NOR031
473 VTD: NOR032
474 VTD: NOR033
475 VTD: NOR034
476 VTD: NOR035
477 VTD: NOR036
478 VTD: NOR037
479 VTD: NOR038
480 VTD: NOR039
481 VTD: NOR040
482 VTD: NOR041
483 VTD: NOR042
484 VTD: NOR043
485 VTD: NOR044
486 VTD: NOR045
487 VTD: NOR046
488 VTD: NOR047
489 VTD: NOR048
490 VTD: NOR049
491 VTD: NOR050
492 VTD: NOR051
493 VTD: NOR052
494 VTD: NOR053
495 VTD: NOR054
496 VTD: NOR055
497 VTD: NOR056
498 VTD: NOR200
499 VTD: NOR201
500 VTD: NOR202
501 VTD: NOR203

HB 3487 16
502 VTD: NOR204
503 VTD: NOR208
504 VTD: NOR213
505 VTD: NOR218
506 VTD: NOR222
507 VTD: NRW001
508 VTD: NRW002
509 VTD: NRW003
510 VTD: NRW004
511 VTD: NRW005
512 VTD: NRW006
513 VTD: NRW007
514 VTD: NRW008
515 VTD: NRW009
516 VTD: NRW010
517 VTD: NRW011
518 VTD: NRW012
519 VTD: NRW013
520 VTD: NRW014
521 VTD: NRW015
522 VTD: NRW016
523 VTD: NRW017
524 VTD: NRW018
525 VTD: NRW019
526 VTD: NRW020
527 VTD: NRW021
528 VTD: NRW022
529 VTD: NRW023
530 VTD: NRW024
531 VTD: NRW025
532 VTD: NRW026
533 VTD: NRW027
534 VTD: NRW028
535 VTD: NRW029
536 VTD: NRW030
537 VTD: NRW031
538 VTD: NRW032

HB 3487 17
539 VTD: NRW033
540 VTD: NRW034
541 VTD: NRW035
542 VTD: NRW036
543 VTD: NRW037
544 VTD: NRW038
545 VTD: NRW039
546 VTD: NRW040
547 VTD: NRW041
548 VTD: NRW042
549 VTD: NRW043
550 VTD: NRW044
551 VTD: NRW045
552 VTD: NRW046
553 VTD: NRW047
554 VTD: NRW048
555 VTD: NRW049
556 VTD: NRW050
557 VTD: NRW051
558 VTD: NRW200
559 VTD: NRW201
560 VTD: NRW202
561 VTD: NRW203
562 VTD: NRW204
563 VTD: NRW205
564 VTD: NW002
565 VTD: NW003
566 VTD: NW004
567 VTD: NW005
568 VTD: NW006
569 VTD: NW007
570 VTD: NW008
571 VTD: NW009
572 VTD: NW010
573 VTD: NW011
574 VTD: NW012
575 VTD: NW014

HB 3487 18
576 VTD: NW015
577 VTD: NW016
578 VTD: NW017
579 VTD: NW018
580 VTD: NW022
581 VTD: NW023
582 VTD: NW024
583 VTD: NW025
584 VTD: NW027
585 VTD: NW028
586 VTD: NW030
587 VTD: NW031
588 VTD: NW032
589 VTD: NW034
590 VTD: NW036
591 VTD: NW037
592 VTD: NW039
593 VTD: NW040
594 VTD: NW041
595 VTD: NW042
596 VTD: NW043
597 VTD: NW044
598 VTD: NW045
599 VTD: NW046
600 VTD: NW048
601 VTD: NW050
602 VTD: NW051
603 VTD: NW200
604 VTD: NW202
605 VTD: NW205
606 VTD: NW206
607 VTD: NW207
608 VTD: NW208
609 VTD: NW209
610 VTD: NW210
611 VTD: NW212
612 VTD: NW213

HB 3487 19
613 VTD: NW214
614 VTD: NW215
615 VTD: NW216
616 VTD: NW217
617 VTD: NW219
618 VTD: NW224
619 VTD: NW225
620 VTD: NW226
621 VTD: NW227
622 VTD: NW229
623 VTD: SF001
624 VTD: SF002
625 VTD: SF003
626 VTD: SF004
627 VTD: SF005
628 VTD: SF006
629 VTD: SF007
630 VTD: SF008
631 VTD: SF009
632 VTD: SF010
633 VTD: SF011
634 VTD: SF012
635 VTD: SF013
636 VTD: SF014
637 VTD: SF015
638 VTD: SF016
639 VTD: SF017
640 VTD: SF018
641 VTD: SF019
642 VTD: SF020
643 VTD: SF021
644 VTD: SF022
645 VTD: SF023
646 VTD: SF024
647 VTD: SF025
648 VTD: SF026
649 VTD: SF027

HB 3487 20
650 VTD: SF028
651 VTD: SF029
652 VTD: SF030
653 VTD: SF031
654 VTD: SF032
655 VTD: SF033
656 VTD: SF034
657 VTD: SF035
658 VTD: SF200
659 VTD: SPL001
660 VTD: SPL002
661 VTD: SPL003
662 VTD: SPL004
663 VTD: SPL005
664 VTD: SPL006
665 VTD: SPL007
666 VTD: SPL008
667 VTD: SPL009
668 VTD: SPL010
669 VTD: SPL011
670 VTD: SPL012
671 VTD: SPL013
672 VTD: SPL014
673 VTD: SPL015
674 VTD: SPL016
675 VTD: SPL017
676 VTD: SPL018
677 VTD: SPL019
678 VTD: SPL020
679 VTD: SPL021
680 VTD: SPL022
681 VTD: SPL023
682 VTD: SPL024
683 VTD: SPL025
684 VTD: SPL026
685 VTD: SPL027
686 VTD: SPL028

HB 3487 21
687 VTD: SPL201
688 VTD: SPL202
689 VTD: SPL207
690 VTD: SPL208
691 VTD: UNV001
692 VTD: UNV002
693 VTD: UNV003
694 VTD: UNV004
695 VTD: UNV005
696 VTD: UNV006
697 VTD: UNV007
698 VTD: UNV008
699 VTD: UNV009
700 VTD: UNV010
701 VTD: UNV011
702 VTD: UNV012
703 VTD: UNV013
704 VTD: UNV014
705 VTD: UNV015
706 VTD: UNV016
707 VTD: UNV017
708 VTD: UNV018
709 VTD: UNV019
710 VTD: UNV020
711 VTD: UNV021
712 VTD: UNV022
713 VTD: UNV023
714 VTD: UNV024
715 VTD: UNV025
716 VTD: UNV026
717 VTD: UNV027
718 VTD: UNV028
719 VTD: UNV029
720 VTD: UNV030
721 VTD: UNV031
722 VTD: UNV032
723 VTD: UNV033

HB 3487 22
724 VTD: UNV034
725 VTD: UNV035
726 VTD: UNV036
727 VTD: UNV037
728 VTD: UNV038
729 VTD: UNV039
730 VTD: UNV040
731 VTD: UNV041
732 VTD: UNV042
733 VTD: UNV043
734 VTD: UNV045
735 VTD: UNV201
736 VTD: UNV202
737 VTD: UNV205
738 VTD: UNV206
739 VTD: UNV208
740 District 1 Total
128.482. The second congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Crawford MO
3 County: Franklin MO
4 County: Gasconade MO
5 County: Jefferson MO
6 VTD: Brennan
7 Block: 290997002111020
8 Block: 290997002111021
9 Block: 290997003032017
10 Block: 290997003051001
11 Block: 290997003051003
12 Block: 290997003052001
13 Block: 290997003052002
14 Block: 290997003052003
15 Block: 290997003052004
16 Block: 290997003052005
17 Block: 290997003052025
18 VTD: Byrnes Mill W-1
19 VTD: Byrnes Mill W-2
20 VTD: Byrnes Mill W-3

HB 3487 23
21 VTD: Byrnesville
22 VTD: Cedar Hill
23 VTD: Cedar Hill Lakes
24 VTD: De Soto W-1
25 VTD: De Soto W-2
26 VTD: De Soto W-3
27 VTD: De Soto W-4
28 VTD: Dulin Creek
29 VTD: Goldman
30 VTD: Grubville
31 VTD: Grubville 2
32 VTD: High Ridge
33 VTD: Hillsboro W-1
34 VTD: Hillsboro W-2
35 VTD: Hillsboro W-3
36 VTD: Hillsboro W-4
37 VTD: Hoene Springs
38 VTD: House Springs
39 VTD: Lake Tekawitha
40 VTD: Lake Tishomingo
41 VTD: Meramec Valley
42 VTD: North Jefferson
43 Block: 290997002062004
44 Block: 290997002062005
45 Block: 290997002072000
46 Block: 290997002072001
47 Block: 290997002072002
48 Block: 290997002072003
49 Block: 290997002072004
50 Block: 290997002072005
51 Block: 290997002072006
52 Block: 290997002072007
53 Block: 290997002072008
54 Block: 290997002072009
55 Block: 290997002072010
56 Block: 290997002072011
57 Block: 290997002072012

HB 3487 24
58 Block: 290997002072013
59 Block: 290997002072014
60 Block: 290997002072017
61 Block: 290997002072018
62 Block: 290997002072019
63 Block: 290997002072020
64 Block: 290997002072021
65 Block: 290997002072022
66 Block: 290997002072023
67 Block: 290997002072024
68 Block: 290997002072025
69 Block: 290997002111019
70 Block: 290997002113004
71 Block: 290997002113005
72 Block: 290997002113006
73 Block: 290997002113007
74 Block: 290997002113008
75 Block: 290997002113009
76 Block: 290997002113012
77 Block: 290997002113013
78 Block: 290997002113014
79 Block: 290997002113015
80 Block: 290997002113016
81 Block: 290997002113017
82 Block: 290997002113019
83 Block: 290997003022000
84 Block: 290997003022001
85 Block: 290997003022002
86 Block: 290997003022015
87 Block: 290997003023002
88 Block: 290997003063001
89 Block: 290997003063003
90 Block: 290997003063004
91 Block: 290997003063005
92 VTD: Northwest
93 VTD: Parkdale
94 VTD: Peaceful Village

HB 3487 25
95 VTD: Raintree
96 VTD: Rockwood
97 VTD: Scotsdale
98 VTD: Valle
99 Block: 290997010023040
100 Block: 290997010023041
101 Block: 290997012006047
102 Block: 290997012006053
103 Block: 290997012006056
104 Block: 290997012006061
105 Block: 290997012006062
106 Block: 290997013001001
107 Block: 290997013001002
108 Block: 290997013001003
109 Block: 290997013001004
110 Block: 290997013001055
111 Block: 290997013001062
112 Block: 290997013001063
113 Block: 290997013001064
114 Block: 290997013001065
115 Block: 290997013001066
116 Block: 290997013001067
117 Block: 290997013001070
118 Block: 290997013001075
119 Block: 290997013001077
120 Block: 290997013003003
121 Block: 290997013003013
122 Block: 290997013003014
123 Block: 290997013003015
124 Block: 290997013003017
125 Block: 290997013003018
126 Block: 290997013003019
127 Block: 290997013003021
128 Block: 290997013003022
129 Block: 290997014012008
130 Block: 290997014012009
131 Block: 290997014012017

HB 3487 26
132 Block: 290997014012021
133 Block: 290997014012022
134 Block: 290997014012023
135 Block: 290997014012064
136 Block: 290997014012065
137 Block: 290997014012066
138 Block: 290997014012067
139 VTD: Victoria
140 Block: 290997010011036
141 Block: 290997010013008
142 Block: 290997010013032
143 Block: 290997010013033
144 Block: 290997010021020
145 Block: 290997010021022
146 Block: 290997010021023
147 Block: 290997010021024
148 Block: 290997010022000
149 Block: 290997010022001
150 Block: 290997010022002
151 Block: 290997010022003
152 Block: 290997010022004
153 Block: 290997010022005
154 Block: 290997010022006
155 Block: 290997010022007
156 Block: 290997010022010
157 Block: 290997010022011
158 Block: 290997010022012
159 Block: 290997010022017
160 Block: 290997010022018
161 Block: 290997010022020
162 Block: 290997010022021
163 Block: 290997010022022
164 Block: 290997010022024
165 Block: 290997010022025
166 Block: 290997010022026
167 Block: 290997010022027
168 Block: 290997010022029

HB 3487 27
169 Block: 290997010022030
170 Block: 290997010023007
171 Block: 290997010023008
172 Block: 290997010023009
173 Block: 290997010023010
174 Block: 290997010023011
175 Block: 290997010023014
176 Block: 290997010023015
177 Block: 290997010023016
178 Block: 290997010023017
179 Block: 290997010023018
180 Block: 290997010023022
181 Block: 290997010023023
182 Block: 290997010023024
183 Block: 290997010023025
184 Block: 290997010023026
185 Block: 290997010023027
186 Block: 290997010023028
187 Block: 290997010023032
188 Block: 290997010023033
189 Block: 290997010023034
190 Block: 290997010023036
191 Block: 290997010023037
192 Block: 290997012001000
193 Block: 290997012001028
194 Block: 290997012001029
195 Block: 290997012001030
196 VTD: Vineland
197 VTD: Ware
198 County: St. Louis MO
199 VTD: AP032
200 VTD: AP041
201 VTD: AP201
202 VTD: AP202
203 VTD: BON001
204 VTD: BON002
205 VTD: BON003

HB 3487 28
206 VTD: BON004
207 VTD: BON005
208 VTD: BON006
209 VTD: BON007
210 VTD: BON008
211 VTD: BON009
212 VTD: BON010
213 VTD: BON011
214 VTD: BON012
215 VTD: BON013
216 VTD: BON014
217 VTD: BON015
218 VTD: BON016
219 VTD: BON017
220 VTD: BON018
221 VTD: BON019
222 VTD: BON020
223 VTD: BON021
224 VTD: BON022
225 VTD: BON023
226 VTD: BON024
227 VTD: BON025
228 VTD: BON026
229 VTD: BON027
230 VTD: BON028
231 VTD: BON029
232 VTD: BON030
233 VTD: BON031
234 VTD: BON032
235 VTD: BON033
236 VTD: BON034
237 VTD: BON035
238 VTD: BON036
239 VTD: BON037
240 VTD: BON038
241 VTD: BON039
242 VTD: BON040

HB 3487 29
243 VTD: BON200
244 VTD: BON202
245 VTD: BON203
246 VTD: BON205
247 VTD: BON206
248 VTD: BON207
249 VTD: BON208
250 VTD: BON210
251 VTD: BON211
252 VTD: CC001
253 VTD: CC002
254 VTD: CC003
255 VTD: CC004
256 VTD: CC005
257 VTD: CC006
258 VTD: CC007
259 VTD: CC008
260 VTD: CC009
261 VTD: CC010
262 VTD: CC011
263 VTD: CC014
264 VTD: CC015
265 VTD: CC016
266 VTD: CC017
267 VTD: CC018
268 VTD: CC019
269 VTD: CC020
270 VTD: CC021
271 VTD: CC023
272 VTD: CC024
273 VTD: CC025
274 VTD: CC026
275 VTD: CC027
276 VTD: CC028
277 VTD: CC029
278 VTD: CC030
279 VTD: CC031

HB 3487 30
280 VTD: CC032
281 VTD: CC033
282 VTD: CC034
283 VTD: CC035
284 VTD: CC036
285 VTD: CC037
286 VTD: CC039
287 VTD: CC040
288 VTD: CC041
289 VTD: CC042
290 VTD: CC043
291 VTD: CC044
292 VTD: CC045
293 VTD: CC046
294 VTD: CC047
295 VTD: CC048
296 Block: 291892155001007
297 Block: 291892155004013
298 Block: 291892155004014
299 Block: 291892155004015
300 Block: 291892155004016
301 Block: 291892155004017
302 VTD: CC049
303 VTD: CC050
304 VTD: CC052
305 VTD: CC053
306 VTD: CC054
307 VTD: CC055
308 VTD: CC056
309 VTD: CC058
310 VTD: CC059
311 VTD: CC060
312 VTD: CC201
313 VTD: CC202
314 VTD: CC203
315 VTD: CC208
316 VTD: CC214

HB 3487 31
317 VTD: CC221
318 VTD: CHE001
319 VTD: CHE002
320 VTD: CHE003
321 VTD: CHE004
322 VTD: CHE005
323 VTD: CHE006
324 VTD: CHE007
325 VTD: CHE008
326 VTD: CHE009
327 VTD: CHE010
328 VTD: CHE011
329 VTD: CHE012
330 VTD: CHE013
331 VTD: CHE014
332 VTD: CHE015
333 VTD: CHE016
334 VTD: CHE017
335 VTD: CHE018
336 VTD: CHE019
337 VTD: CHE020
338 VTD: CHE021
339 VTD: CHE022
340 VTD: CHE023
341 VTD: CHE024
342 VTD: CHE025
343 VTD: CHE026
344 VTD: CHE027
345 VTD: CHE028
346 VTD: CHE029
347 VTD: CHE030
348 VTD: CHE031
349 VTD: CHE032
350 VTD: CHE033
351 VTD: CHE034
352 VTD: CHE035
353 VTD: CHE036

HB 3487 32
354 VTD: CHE037
355 VTD: CHE038
356 VTD: CHE039
357 VTD: CHE040
358 VTD: CHE041
359 VTD: CHE042
360 VTD: CHE043
361 VTD: CHE044
362 VTD: CHE045
363 VTD: CHE046
364 VTD: CHE047
365 VTD: CHE048
366 VTD: CHE049
367 VTD: CHE050
368 VTD: CHE051
369 VTD: CHE052
370 VTD: CHE053
371 VTD: CHE054
372 VTD: CHE055
373 VTD: CHE057
374 VTD: CHE200
375 VTD: CHE203
376 VTD: CHE212
377 VTD: CHE214
378 VTD: CHE215
379 VTD: CLA004
380 Block: 291892154004014
381 VTD: CLA006
382 VTD: CLA007
383 VTD: CLA012
384 VTD: CLA013
385 Block: 291892154003013
386 Block: 291892154003014
387 Block: 291892154004000
388 Block: 291892154004001
389 Block: 291892154004002
390 Block: 291892154004003

HB 3487 33
391 Block: 291892154004004
392 Block: 291892154004008
393 Block: 291892154004012
394 Block: 291892154004013
395 Block: 291892154005001
396 Block: 291892154005002
397 Block: 291892154005003
398 VTD: CLA014
399 VTD: CLA015
400 VTD: CLA016
401 VTD: CLA024
402 VTD: CLA025
403 VTD: CLA026
404 VTD: CLA028
405 VTD: CLA033
406 VTD: CLA034
407 VTD: CLA036
408 VTD: CLA037
409 VTD: CLA040
410 VTD: CLA042
411 VTD: CLA045
412 VTD: CLA047
413 VTD: CLA049
414 VTD: CLA201
415 VTD: CLA202
416 VTD: CLA203
417 VTD: CLA205
418 VTD: CON001
419 VTD: CON002
420 VTD: CON003
421 VTD: CON004
422 VTD: CON005
423 VTD: CON006
424 VTD: CON007
425 VTD: CON008
426 VTD: CON009
427 VTD: CON010

HB 3487 34
428 VTD: CON011
429 VTD: CON012
430 VTD: CON013
431 VTD: CON014
432 VTD: CON015
433 VTD: CON016
434 VTD: CON017
435 VTD: CON018
436 VTD: CON019
437 VTD: CON020
438 VTD: CON021
439 VTD: CON022
440 VTD: CON023
441 VTD: CON024
442 VTD: CON025
443 VTD: CON026
444 VTD: CON027
445 VTD: CON028
446 VTD: CON029
447 VTD: CON030
448 VTD: CON031
449 VTD: CON032
450 VTD: CON033
451 VTD: CON034
452 VTD: CON035
453 VTD: CON036
454 VTD: CON037
455 VTD: CON038
456 VTD: CON039
457 VTD: CON040
458 VTD: CON041
459 VTD: CON042
460 VTD: CON043
461 VTD: CON044
462 VTD: CON045
463 VTD: CON046
464 VTD: CON047

HB 3487 35
465 VTD: CON048
466 VTD: CON049
467 VTD: CON050
468 VTD: CON051
469 VTD: CON052
470 VTD: CON053
471 VTD: CON200
472 VTD: CON202
473 VTD: CON204
474 VTD: CON205
475 VTD: CON206
476 VTD: CON212
477 VTD: CON213
478 VTD: GRA001
479 VTD: GRA002
480 VTD: GRA003
481 VTD: GRA004
482 VTD: GRA005
483 VTD: GRA006
484 Block: 291892219001000
485 Block: 291892219001001
486 Block: 291892219001002
487 Block: 291892219001004
488 Block: 291892219001005
489 Block: 291892219001006
490 Block: 291892219001007
491 Block: 291892219001009
492 Block: 291892219001010
493 Block: 291892219002004
494 Block: 291892219002006
495 Block: 291892219002007
496 Block: 291892219002008
497 Block: 291892219002009
498 Block: 291892219003000
499 Block: 291892219003001
500 Block: 291892219003008
501 Block: 291892219003009

HB 3487 36
502 Block: 291892219003010
503 Block: 291892219003011
504 VTD: GRA007
505 Block: 291892198012003
506 Block: 291892198012006
507 Block: 291892198012007
508 Block: 291892198012008
509 Block: 291892198012009
510 Block: 291892198012010
511 Block: 291892198012011
512 VTD: GRA008
513 VTD: GRA009
514 VTD: GRA010
515 VTD: GRA011
516 VTD: GRA012
517 VTD: GRA013
518 VTD: GRA014
519 VTD: GRA015
520 Block: 291892197003015
521 Block: 291892197004003
522 Block: 291892197004004
523 Block: 291892197004005
524 Block: 291892197004006
525 Block: 291892197004007
526 Block: 291892197004008
527 Block: 291892197004009
528 Block: 291892208013000
529 Block: 291892208013001
530 Block: 291892208013002
531 Block: 291892208013003
532 Block: 291892208013004
533 Block: 291892208013005
534 Block: 291892208013006
535 Block: 291892208013007
536 Block: 291892208013008
537 Block: 291892208013009
538 VTD: GRA017

HB 3487 37
539 VTD: GRA019
540 Block: 291892197004000
541 Block: 291892197004001
542 Block: 291892197004002
543 Block: 291892197004010
544 Block: 291892197004011
545 Block: 291892197004012
546 Block: 291892198012004
547 Block: 291892198012005
548 VTD: GRA020
549 VTD: GRA023
550 VTD: GRA024
551 VTD: GRA026
552 VTD: GRA027
553 VTD: GRA028
554 VTD: GRA029
555 VTD: GRA030
556 VTD: GRA031
557 VTD: GRA032
558 VTD: GRA033
559 Block: 291892199001007
560 Block: 291892199004000
561 Block: 291892199004001
562 Block: 291892199004002
563 Block: 291892199004003
564 Block: 291892199004004
565 VTD: GRA034
566 VTD: GRA036
567 VTD: GRA037
568 VTD: GRA038
569 VTD: GRA040
570 VTD: GRA041
571 VTD: GRA042
572 VTD: GRA043
573 VTD: GRA044
574 VTD: GRA046
575 VTD: GRA047

HB 3487 38
576 VTD: GRA048
577 VTD: GRA201
578 VTD: GRA206
579 VTD: GRA209
580 VTD: GRA210
581 VTD: JEF001
582 VTD: JEF002
583 VTD: JEF003
584 VTD: JEF004
585 VTD: JEF032
586 VTD: JEF033
587 VTD: JEF034
588 VTD: JEF035
589 VTD: JEF036
590 VTD: JEF037
591 VTD: JEF200
592 VTD: LAF001
593 VTD: LAF002
594 VTD: LAF003
595 VTD: LAF004
596 VTD: LAF005
597 VTD: LAF006
598 VTD: LAF007
599 VTD: LAF008
600 VTD: LAF009
601 VTD: LAF010
602 VTD: LAF011
603 VTD: LAF012
604 VTD: LAF013
605 VTD: LAF014
606 VTD: LAF015
607 VTD: LAF016
608 VTD: LAF017
609 VTD: LAF018
610 VTD: LAF019
611 VTD: LAF020
612 VTD: LAF022

HB 3487 39
613 VTD: LAF023
614 VTD: LAF024
615 VTD: LAF025
616 VTD: LAF026
617 VTD: LAF027
618 VTD: LAF028
619 VTD: LAF029
620 VTD: LAF030
621 VTD: LAF031
622 VTD: LAF032
623 VTD: LAF033
624 VTD: LAF034
625 VTD: LAF035
626 VTD: LAF036
627 VTD: LAF037
628 VTD: LAF038
629 VTD: LAF039
630 VTD: LAF040
631 VTD: LAF041
632 VTD: LAF042
633 VTD: LAF043
634 VTD: LAF044
635 VTD: LAF045
636 VTD: LAF046
637 VTD: LAF200
638 VTD: LAF205
639 VTD: LAF207
640 VTD: LEM001
641 VTD: LEM002
642 VTD: LEM003
643 VTD: LEM004
644 VTD: LEM005
645 VTD: LEM006
646 VTD: LEM007
647 VTD: LEM008
648 VTD: LEM009
649 VTD: LEM010

HB 3487 40
650 VTD: LEM011
651 VTD: LEM012
652 VTD: LEM013
653 VTD: LEM014
654 VTD: LEM015
655 VTD: LEM016
656 VTD: LEM017
657 VTD: LEM018
658 VTD: LEM019
659 VTD: LEM020
660 VTD: LEM021
661 VTD: LEM022
662 VTD: LEM023
663 VTD: LEM024
664 VTD: LEM025
665 VTD: LEM026
666 VTD: LEM027
667 VTD: LEM028
668 VTD: LEM029
669 VTD: LEM030
670 VTD: LEM031
671 VTD: LEM032
672 VTD: LEM033
673 VTD: LEM200
674 VTD: LEM201
675 VTD: LEM202
676 VTD: LEM204
677 VTD: LEM205
678 VTD: LEM208
679 VTD: MER001
680 VTD: MER002
681 VTD: MER003
682 VTD: MER004
683 VTD: MER005
684 VTD: MER006
685 VTD: MER007
686 VTD: MER008

HB 3487 41
687 VTD: MER009
688 VTD: MER010
689 VTD: MER011
690 VTD: MER012
691 VTD: MER013
692 VTD: MER014
693 VTD: MER015
694 VTD: MER016
695 VTD: MER017
696 VTD: MER018
697 VTD: MER019
698 VTD: MER020
699 VTD: MER021
700 VTD: MER022
701 VTD: MER023
702 VTD: MER024
703 VTD: MER025
704 VTD: MER026
705 VTD: MER027
706 VTD: MER028
707 VTD: MER029
708 VTD: MER030
709 VTD: MER031
710 VTD: MER032
711 VTD: MER033
712 VTD: MER034
713 VTD: MER035
714 VTD: MER036
715 VTD: MER037
716 VTD: MER038
717 VTD: MER039
718 VTD: MER040
719 VTD: MER041
720 VTD: MER042
721 VTD: MER043
722 VTD: MER044
723 VTD: MER045

HB 3487 42
724 VTD: MER046
725 VTD: MER047
726 VTD: MER048
727 VTD: MER200
728 VTD: MER202
729 VTD: MER204
730 VTD: MER207
731 VTD: MER209
732 VTD: MER210
733 VTD: MER213
734 VTD: MER214
735 VTD: MER215
736 VTD: MER219
737 VTD: MHT001
738 VTD: MHT002
739 VTD: MHT003
740 VTD: MHT004
741 VTD: MHT005
742 VTD: MHT006
743 VTD: MHT007
744 VTD: MHT008
745 VTD: MHT009
746 VTD: MHT010
747 VTD: MHT011
748 VTD: MHT012
749 VTD: MHT013
750 VTD: MHT014
751 VTD: MHT015
752 VTD: MHT016
753 VTD: MHT017
754 VTD: MHT018
755 VTD: MHT019
756 VTD: MHT020
757 VTD: MHT021
758 VTD: MHT022
759 VTD: MHT023
760 VTD: MHT024

HB 3487 43
761 VTD: MHT025
762 VTD: MHT026
763 VTD: MHT027
764 VTD: MHT028
765 VTD: MHT029
766 VTD: MHT030
767 VTD: MHT031
768 VTD: MHT032
769 VTD: MHT033
770 VTD: MHT034
771 VTD: MHT035
772 VTD: MHT036
773 VTD: MHT037
774 VTD: MHT038
775 VTD: MHT039
776 VTD: MHT040
777 VTD: MHT041
778 VTD: MHT042
779 VTD: MHT043
780 VTD: MHT044
781 VTD: MHT045
782 VTD: MHT046
783 VTD: MHT047
784 VTD: MHT048
785 VTD: MHT049
786 VTD: MHT050
787 VTD: MHT051
788 VTD: MHT052
789 VTD: MHT053
790 VTD: MHT054
791 VTD: MHT055
792 VTD: MHT056
793 VTD: MHT057
794 VTD: MHT058
795 VTD: MHT059
796 VTD: MHT200
797 VTD: MHT203

HB 3487 44
798 VTD: MHT206
799 VTD: MHT207
800 VTD: MHT208
801 VTD: MHT211
802 VTD: MHT212
803 VTD: MHT213
804 VTD: MHT214
805 VTD: MHT216
806 VTD: MHT219
807 VTD: MHT220
808 VTD: MHT222
809 VTD: MHT223
810 VTD: MR001
811 VTD: MR002
812 VTD: MR003
813 VTD: MR004
814 VTD: MR005
815 VTD: MR006
816 VTD: MR007
817 VTD: MR008
818 VTD: MR009
819 VTD: MR010
820 VTD: MR011
821 VTD: MR012
822 VTD: MR013
823 VTD: MR014
824 VTD: MR015
825 VTD: MR016
826 VTD: MR017
827 VTD: MR018
828 VTD: MR019
829 VTD: MR020
830 VTD: MR021
831 VTD: MR022
832 VTD: MR023
833 VTD: MR024
834 VTD: MR025

HB 3487 45
835 VTD: MR026
836 VTD: MR027
837 VTD: MR028
838 VTD: MR029
839 VTD: MR030
840 VTD: MR031
841 VTD: MR032
842 VTD: MR033
843 VTD: MR034
844 VTD: MR035
845 VTD: MR036
846 VTD: MR037
847 VTD: MR038
848 VTD: MR039
849 VTD: MR040
850 VTD: MR041
851 VTD: MR042
852 VTD: MR043
853 VTD: MR044
854 VTD: MR045
855 VTD: MR046
856 VTD: MR047
857 VTD: MR048
858 VTD: MR049
859 VTD: MR050
860 VTD: MR051
861 VTD: MR052
862 VTD: MR053
863 VTD: MR054
864 VTD: MR055
865 VTD: MR056
866 VTD: MR057
867 VTD: MR058
868 VTD: MR059
869 VTD: MR200
870 VTD: MR202
871 VTD: MR203

HB 3487 46
872 VTD: MR204
873 VTD: MR205
874 VTD: MR209
875 VTD: MR210
876 VTD: MR212
877 VTD: MR213
878 VTD: NW001
879 VTD: NW013
880 Block: 291892151431031
881 Block: 291892151431044
882 Block: 291892151431045
883 Block: 291892151431046
884 Block: 291892151431047
885 Block: 291892151431048
886 Block: 291892151431049
887 Block: 291892151431050
888 Block: 291892151431052
889 Block: 291892151431053
890 Block: 291892151431054
891 Block: 291892151431055
892 Block: 291892151431056
893 Block: 291892151431057
894 Block: 291892151431063
895 VTD: NW019
896 VTD: NW020
897 VTD: NW026
898 VTD: NW029
899 VTD: NW033
900 VTD: NW035
901 Block: 291892151432015
902 Block: 291892151432017
903 Block: 291892151432018
904 Block: 291892151432019
905 Block: 291892151432020
906 Block: 291892151432021
907 Block: 291892151432022
908 Block: 291892151432023

HB 3487 47
909 VTD: NW038
910 VTD: NW047
911 VTD: NW049
912 VTD: NW052
913 VTD: NW201
914 VTD: NW211
915 VTD: OAK001
916 VTD: OAK002
917 VTD: OAK003
918 VTD: OAK004
919 VTD: OAK005
920 VTD: OAK006
921 VTD: OAK007
922 VTD: OAK008
923 VTD: OAK009
924 VTD: OAK010
925 VTD: OAK011
926 VTD: OAK012
927 VTD: OAK013
928 VTD: OAK014
929 VTD: OAK015
930 VTD: OAK016
931 VTD: OAK017
932 VTD: OAK018
933 VTD: OAK019
934 VTD: OAK020
935 VTD: OAK021
936 VTD: OAK022
937 VTD: OAK023
938 VTD: OAK024
939 VTD: OAK025
940 VTD: OAK026
941 VTD: OAK027
942 VTD: OAK028
943 VTD: OAK029
944 VTD: QUE001
945 VTD: QUE002

HB 3487 48
946 VTD: QUE003
947 VTD: QUE004
948 VTD: QUE005
949 VTD: QUE006
950 VTD: QUE007
951 VTD: QUE008
952 VTD: QUE009
953 VTD: QUE010
954 VTD: QUE011
955 VTD: QUE012
956 VTD: QUE013
957 VTD: QUE014
958 VTD: QUE015
959 VTD: QUE016
960 VTD: QUE017
961 VTD: QUE018
962 VTD: QUE019
963 VTD: QUE020
964 VTD: QUE021
965 VTD: QUE022
966 VTD: QUE023
967 VTD: QUE024
968 VTD: QUE025
969 VTD: QUE026
970 VTD: QUE027
971 VTD: QUE028
972 VTD: QUE029
973 VTD: QUE030
974 VTD: QUE031
975 VTD: QUE032
976 VTD: QUE033
977 VTD: QUE034
978 VTD: QUE035
979 VTD: QUE036
980 VTD: QUE037
981 VTD: QUE038
982 VTD: QUE039

HB 3487 49
983 VTD: QUE040
984 VTD: QUE041
985 VTD: QUE042
986 VTD: QUE043
987 VTD: QUE044
988 VTD: QUE045
989 VTD: QUE046
990 VTD: QUE047
991 VTD: QUE048
992 VTD: QUE049
993 VTD: QUE200
994 VTD: QUE201
995 VTD: QUE202
996 VTD: QUE203
997 VTD: QUE204
998 VTD: QUE205
999 VTD: QUE207
1000 VTD: QUE208
1001 VTD: QUE209
1002 VTD: QUE210
1003 VTD: QUE211
1004 VTD: QUE213
1005 VTD: TSF001
1006 VTD: TSF002
1007 VTD: TSF003
1008 VTD: TSF004
1009 VTD: TSF005
1010 VTD: TSF006
1011 VTD: TSF007
1012 VTD: TSF008
1013 VTD: TSF009
1014 VTD: TSF010
1015 VTD: TSF011
1016 VTD: TSF012
1017 VTD: TSF013
1018 VTD: TSF014
1019 VTD: TSF015

HB 3487 50
1020 VTD: TSF016
1021 VTD: TSF017
1022 VTD: TSF018
1023 VTD: TSF019
1024 VTD: TSF020
1025 VTD: TSF021
1026 VTD: TSF022
1027 VTD: TSF023
1028 VTD: TSF024
1029 VTD: TSF025
1030 VTD: TSF026
1031 VTD: TSF027
1032 VTD: TSF201
1033 VTD: WH001
1034 VTD: WH002
1035 VTD: WH003
1036 VTD: WH004
1037 VTD: WH005
1038 VTD: WH006
1039 VTD: WH007
1040 VTD: WH008
1041 VTD: WH009
1042 VTD: WH010
1043 VTD: WH011
1044 VTD: WH012
1045 VTD: WH013
1046 VTD: WH014
1047 VTD: WH015
1048 VTD: WH016
1049 VTD: WH017
1050 VTD: WH018
1051 VTD: WH019
1052 VTD: WH020
1053 VTD: WH021
1054 VTD: WH022
1055 VTD: WH023
1056 VTD: WH024

HB 3487 51
1057 VTD: WH025
1058 VTD: WH026
1059 VTD: WH027
1060 VTD: WH028
1061 VTD: WH029
1062 VTD: WH030
1063 VTD: WH031
1064 VTD: WH032
1065 VTD: WH033
1066 VTD: WH034
1067 VTD: WH035
1068 VTD: WH036
1069 VTD: WH037
1070 VTD: WH038
1071 VTD: WH039
1072 VTD: WH040
1073 VTD: WH041
1074 VTD: WH042
1075 VTD: WH043
1076 VTD: WH044
1077 VTD: WH045
1078 VTD: WH046
1079 VTD: WH047
1080 VTD: WH200
1081 VTD: WH201
1082 VTD: WH202
1083 VTD: WH203
1084 VTD: WH208
1085 County: Washington MO
1086 District 2 Total
128.483. The third congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Audrain MO
3 County: Boone MO
4 VTD: 17
5 Block: 290190015062014
6 Block: 290190015062023
7 Block: 290190015062031

HB 3487 52
8 VTD: 1A
9 VTD: 1B
10 VTD: 1C
11 VTD: 1D
12 VTD: 1E
13 VTD: 1F
14 VTD: 1G
15 VTD: 1I
16 VTD: 1J
17 VTD: 1K
18 VTD: 1L
19 VTD: 1M
20 VTD: 21
21 Block: 290190013003006
22 Block: 290190013003008
23 Block: 290190013003009
24 Block: 290190013003023
25 Block: 290190018061001
26 Block: 290190018061002
27 Block: 290190018061003
28 Block: 290190018061004
29 Block: 290190018061008
30 Block: 290190018061009
31 Block: 290190018061010
32 Block: 290190018061011
33 Block: 290190018061012
34 Block: 290190018061016
35 Block: 290190018061017
36 VTD: 22
37 Block: 290190014013035
38 Block: 290190014013036
39 Block: 290190014013041
40 Block: 290190014013045
41 Block: 290190014013046
42 VTD: 23
43 VTD: 24
44 VTD: 25

HB 3487 53
45 VTD: 26
46 VTD: 27
47 VTD: 28
48 VTD: 29
49 VTD: 2A
50 VTD: 2B
51 VTD: 2C
52 VTD: 2D
53 VTD: 2F
54 VTD: 2G
55 VTD: 2H
56 VTD: 2I
57 VTD: 2J
58 VTD: 2K
59 Block: 290190013003002
60 Block: 290190013003005
61 Block: 290190013003007
62 Block: 290190013003010
63 Block: 290190013003024
64 Block: 290190013003025
65 Block: 290190013003026
66 Block: 290190013003027
67 VTD: 2L
68 VTD: 30
69 VTD: 31
70 VTD: 32
71 VTD: 33
72 VTD: 34
73 VTD: 35
74 VTD: 36
75 VTD: 37
76 Block: 290190018062044
77 Block: 290190018062048
78 Block: 290190018062049
79 Block: 290190018062053
80 VTD: 3A
81 VTD: 3B

HB 3487 54
82 VTD: 3C
83 VTD: 3D
84 VTD: 3E
85 VTD: 3F
86 VTD: 3G
87 VTD: 3H
88 VTD: 3I
89 VTD: 3J
90 VTD: 3L
91 VTD: 3M
92 VTD: 3N
93 VTD: 40
94 Block: 290190015081004
95 Block: 290190015081005
96 Block: 290190015083016
97 Block: 290190015083024
98 VTD: 41
99 VTD: 42
100 VTD: 43
101 VTD: 44
102 VTD: 45
103 Block: 290190015033036
104 Block: 290190015033037
105 Block: 290190015083007
106 Block: 290190015083008
107 VTD: 4A
108 VTD: 4B
109 Block: 290190012013004
110 Block: 290190012013005
111 Block: 290190012013006
112 Block: 290190012013007
113 Block: 290190012013008
114 Block: 290190012013034
115 Block: 290190012014018
116 VTD: 4C
117 VTD: 4D
118 VTD: 4E

HB 3487 55
119 VTD: 4F
120 VTD: 4G
121 VTD: 4H
122 VTD: 4I
123 VTD: 4J
124 VTD: 4K
125 VTD: 4L
126 Block: 290190012013009
127 Block: 290190012013010
128 Block: 290190012013011
129 Block: 290190012014002
130 Block: 290190012014003
131 Block: 290190012014004
132 Block: 290190012014005
133 Block: 290190012014006
134 Block: 290190012014007
135 Block: 290190012014008
136 Block: 290190012014009
137 Block: 290190012014010
138 Block: 290190012014011
139 Block: 290190012014012
140 Block: 290190012014013
141 Block: 290190012014014
142 Block: 290190012014019
143 Block: 290190012014020
144 Block: 290190012014021
145 Block: 290190012014022
146 Block: 290190012014023
147 Block: 290190012014024
148 Block: 290190012014025
149 Block: 290190012014026
150 VTD: 4M
151 VTD: 5A
152 VTD: 5B
153 VTD: 5C
154 VTD: 5D
155 VTD: 5E

HB 3487 56
156 VTD: 5F
157 VTD: 5G
158 VTD: 5H
159 VTD: 5I
160 VTD: 5J
161 VTD: 5K
162 VTD: 5L
163 VTD: 5M
164 VTD: 5N
165 VTD: 5P
166 VTD: 6A
167 VTD: 6B
168 VTD: 6C
169 VTD: 6D
170 VTD: 6E
171 VTD: 6F
172 VTD: 6G
173 VTD: 6H
174 VTD: 6I
175 VTD: 6J
176 VTD: 6K
177 VTD: 6L
178 VTD: 6M
179 County: Callaway MO
180 County: Lincoln MO
181 County: Monroe MO
182 County: Montgomery MO
183 County: Pike MO
184 County: Ralls MO
185 County: St. Charles MO
186 County: St. Louis MO
187 VTD: NW013
188 Block: 291892151431003
189 Block: 291892151431005
190 Block: 291892151431006
191 Block: 291892151431007
192 Block: 291892151431008

HB 3487 57
193 Block: 291892151431009
194 Block: 291892151431010
195 Block: 291892151431011
196 Block: 291892151431012
197 Block: 291892151431013
198 Block: 291892151431014
199 Block: 291892151431015
200 Block: 291892151431016
201 Block: 291892151431019
202 Block: 291892151431020
203 Block: 291892151431021
204 Block: 291892151431024
205 Block: 291892151431025
206 Block: 291892151431026
207 Block: 291892151431027
208 Block: 291892151431029
209 Block: 291892151431030
210 Block: 291892151431033
211 Block: 291892151431051
212 Block: 291892151431064
213 VTD: NW021
214 VTD: NW035
215 Block: 291892151432000
216 Block: 291892151432001
217 Block: 291892151432002
218 Block: 291892151432003
219 Block: 291892151432004
220 Block: 291892151432005
221 Block: 291892151432006
222 Block: 291892151432007
223 Block: 291892151432008
224 Block: 291892151432009
225 Block: 291892151432010
226 Block: 291892151432011
227 Block: 291892151432012
228 Block: 291892151432013
229 Block: 291892151432014

HB 3487 58
230 Block: 291892151432016
231 VTD: NW203
232 VTD: NW204
233 VTD: NW220
234 County: Warren MO
235 District 3 Total
128.484. The fourth congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Barton MO
3 County: Bates MO
4 County: Benton MO
5 County: Camden MO
6 County: Cass MO
7 County: Cedar MO
8 County: Dade MO
9 County: Dallas MO
10 County: Henry MO
11 County: Hickory MO
12 County: Jackson MO
13 VTD: 412
14 VTD: 413
15 VTD: 414
16 VTD: 415
17 VTD: 616
18 VTD: 617
19 VTD: 618
20 VTD: 619
21 VTD: KC 1001
22 VTD: KC 1002
23 VTD: KC 1003
24 VTD: KC 1004
25 Block: 290950100021008
26 Block: 290950100021014
27 VTD: KC 1005
28 VTD: KC 1006
29 VTD: KC 1007
30 VTD: KC 1008
31 Block: 290950100022004

HB 3487 59
32 Block: 290950100022008
33 Block: 290950100022011
34 VTD: KC 1009
35 Block: 290950100022002
36 Block: 290950100022003
37 Block: 290950100023000
38 Block: 290950100023001
39 Block: 290950100023002
40 Block: 290950100023003
41 Block: 290950100023004
42 Block: 290950100023005
43 Block: 290950100023006
44 VTD: KC 101
45 VTD: KC 1010
46 VTD: KC 1011
47 VTD: KC 1012
48 VTD: KC 102
49 VTD: KC 103
50 VTD: KC 104
51 VTD: KC 105
52 VTD: KC 106
53 VTD: KC 107
54 VTD: KC 1101
55 Block: 290950003001005
56 Block: 290950003001008
57 Block: 290950003001009
58 Block: 290950003001010
59 Block: 290950003001011
60 Block: 290950003001012
61 Block: 290950003001013
62 Block: 290950003001014
63 Block: 290950003001017
64 Block: 290950003001018
65 Block: 290950003001019
66 Block: 290950003001020
67 Block: 290950003001021
68 Block: 290950003001022

HB 3487 60
69 Block: 290950003001024
70 Block: 290950003001025
71 Block: 290950003001026
72 Block: 290950003003016
73 Block: 290950003003022
74 Block: 290950003003023
75 Block: 290950003003025
76 VTD: KC 1108
77 VTD: KC 1112
78 VTD: KC 1916
79 VTD: KC 1919
80 VTD: KC 2001
81 Block: 290950131002011
82 Block: 290950131002012
83 Block: 290950131002013
84 Block: 290950131002016
85 Block: 290950131002017
86 Block: 290950132082007
87 Block: 290950132082008
88 Block: 290950132082009
89 Block: 290950132082010
90 Block: 290950132082011
91 Block: 290950132082012
92 Block: 290950132082013
93 Block: 290950132082016
94 VTD: KC 2002
95 VTD: KC 2003
96 VTD: KC 2004
97 VTD: KC 2005
98 VTD: KC 2006
99 VTD: KC 2007
100 VTD: KC 2008
101 VTD: KC 2009
102 VTD: KC 201
103 VTD: KC 2010
104 VTD: KC 202
105 VTD: KC 203

HB 3487 61
106 Block: 290950154012001
107 Block: 290950154012002
108 Block: 290950154012003
109 Block: 290950154012004
110 Block: 290950154012013
111 Block: 290950154012014
112 Block: 290950154012015
113 Block: 290950154012016
114 Block: 290950154012017
115 Block: 290950154012020
116 Block: 290950154012021
117 Block: 290950154012022
118 Block: 290950154012023
119 Block: 290950154012024
120 VTD: KC 208
121 VTD: KC 212
122 Block: 290950043001000
123 Block: 290950043001001
124 Block: 290950043001007
125 Block: 290950043001009
126 Block: 290950043001010
127 Block: 290950043001019
128 Block: 290950043001020
129 Block: 290950043001021
130 Block: 290950154012037
131 Block: 290950154012058
132 Block: 290950154012059
133 Block: 290950158001000
134 Block: 290950158001027
135 Block: 290950158001029
136 Block: 290950158001030
137 Block: 290950158001064
138 Block: 290950158002026
139 Block: 290950159002028
140 Block: 290950159002029
141 Block: 290950161001032
142 Block: 290950161002032

HB 3487 62
143 Block: 290950161002033
144 VTD: KC 217
145 VTD: KC 218
146 Block: 290950154011002
147 Block: 290950154011003
148 Block: 290950154011004
149 Block: 290950154011005
150 Block: 290950154011006
151 Block: 290950154011008
152 Block: 290950154011013
153 Block: 290950154011014
154 Block: 290950154011017
155 Block: 290950154011018
156 Block: 290950154011019
157 Block: 290950154011020
158 Block: 290950154011024
159 Block: 290950154011025
160 Block: 290950154012005
161 Block: 290950154012012
162 Block: 290950154012025
163 VTD: KC 2201
164 VTD: KC 2202
165 VTD: KC 2203
166 VTD: KC 2204
167 VTD: KC 2205
168 VTD: KC 2206
169 VTD: KC 2207
170 VTD: KC 2208
171 VTD: KC 2209
172 VTD: KC 2210
173 VTD: KC 2211
174 VTD: KC 2212
175 VTD: KC 2213
176 VTD: KC 2502
177 VTD: KC 2503
178 Block: 290950136124000
179 Block: 290950136124002

HB 3487 63
180 Block: 290959883001007
181 Block: 290959883001008
182 Block: 290959883001011
183 Block: 290959883001012
184 Block: 290959883001013
185 Block: 290959883001014
186 Block: 290959883001015
187 Block: 290959883001016
188 Block: 290959883001017
189 VTD: KC 2508
190 Block: 290950132082014
191 Block: 290950132082015
192 VTD: KC 2510
193 VTD: KC 2511
194 VTD: KC 2512
195 VTD: KC 401
196 VTD: KC 402
197 VTD: KC 403
198 VTD: KC 404
199 VTD: KC 405
200 VTD: KC 406
201 VTD: KC 407
202 VTD: KC 408
203 VTD: KC 409
204 VTD: KC 410
205 VTD: KC 411
206 VTD: KC 501
207 VTD: KC 502
208 VTD: KC 503
209 VTD: KC 504
210 VTD: KC 505
211 VTD: KC 506
212 VTD: KC 507
213 VTD: KC 508
214 VTD: KC 509
215 VTD: KC 510
216 VTD: KC 511

HB 3487 64
217 VTD: KC 512
218 VTD: KC 513
219 VTD: KC 601
220 VTD: KC 602
221 VTD: KC 603
222 VTD: KC 604
223 VTD: KC 605
224 VTD: KC 606
225 VTD: KC 607
226 VTD: KC 608
227 VTD: KC 609
228 VTD: KC 610
229 VTD: KC 611
230 VTD: KC 612
231 VTD: KC 613
232 VTD: KC 614
233 VTD: KC 615
234 VTD: KC 801
235 VTD: KC 802
236 VTD: KC 803
237 VTD: KC 804
238 VTD: KC 805
239 VTD: KC 806
240 VTD: KC 807
241 VTD: KC 808
242 VTD: KC 809
243 Block: 290950086001004
244 Block: 290950086001005
245 Block: 290950086001006
246 Block: 290950086001007
247 Block: 290950086001008
248 Block: 290950086001009
249 Block: 290950086002006
250 Block: 290950086002007
251 Block: 290950086002008
252 Block: 290950086002009
253 Block: 290950086002010

HB 3487 65
254 Block: 290950086002011
255 Block: 290950086002012
256 Block: 290950086002013
257 Block: 290950086002014
258 Block: 290950086002015
259 Block: 290950086002016
260 Block: 290950086002017
261 Block: 290950086002018
262 Block: 290950086002019
263 Block: 290950086002020
264 Block: 290950086002021
265 Block: 290950086002022
266 Block: 290950086002023
267 Block: 290950086002024
268 Block: 290950086002025
269 Block: 290950086002026
270 Block: 290950086002027
271 Block: 290950086002028
272 VTD: KC 811
273 VTD: KC 812
274 VTD: KC 813
275 VTD: KC 814
276 VTD: KC 815
277 VTD: KC 901
278 VTD: KC 902
279 VTD: KC 903
280 VTD: KC 904
281 VTD: KC 906
282 VTD: KC 907
283 VTD: KC 908
284 VTD: KC 909
285 VTD: KC 910
286 VTD: KC 911
287 VTD: KC WD2 PCT211
288 Block: 290950018003000
289 Block: 290950018003001
290 Block: 290950018003002

HB 3487 66
291 Block: 290950018003003
292 Block: 290950018003004
293 Block: 290950018003005
294 Block: 290950018003006
295 Block: 290950018003007
296 Block: 290950018003008
297 Block: 290950018003009
298 Block: 290950018003011
299 Block: 290950018003012
300 Block: 290950018003013
301 Block: 290950018003014
302 Block: 290950018004003
303 Block: 290950018004004
304 VTD: KC WD8 PCT810
305 VTD: Prairie 03
306 VTD: Prairie 04
307 VTD: Prairie 05
308 VTD: Prairie 06
309 VTD: Prairie 07
310 VTD: Prairie 08
311 VTD: Prairie 09
312 VTD: Prairie 11
313 VTD: Prairie 12
314 VTD: Prairie 13
315 VTD: Prairie 14
316 VTD: Prairie 15
317 VTD: Prairie 16
318 VTD: Prairie 17
319 VTD: Prairie 18
320 VTD: Prairie 19
321 VTD: Prairie 20
322 VTD: Prairie 21
323 VTD: Prairie 22
324 VTD: Prairie 23
325 VTD: Prairie 24
326 VTD: Prairie 26
327 VTD: Prairie 27

HB 3487 67
328 VTD: Prairie 28
329 VTD: Prairie 29
330 VTD: Prairie 30
331 VTD: Prairie 31
332 VTD: Prairie 32
333 VTD: Prairie 33
334 VTD: Prairie 34
335 VTD: Prairie 35
336 VTD: Prairie 36
337 VTD: Prairie 37
338 VTD: Prairie 38
339 VTD: Prairie 39
340 VTD: Prairie 40
341 VTD: Prairie 41
342 VTD: Prairie 42
343 VTD: Prairie 43
344 VTD: Prairie 44
345 VTD: Prairie 45
346 VTD: Prairie 46
347 VTD: Prairie 47
348 VTD: Prairie 48
349 VTD: Prairie 49
350 VTD: Prairie 50
351 VTD: Prairie 51
352 VTD: Prairie 52
353 VTD: Prairie 56
354 VTD: Prairie 59
355 VTD: Prairie 60
356 VTD: Prairie 62
357 VTD: Prarie 02
358 VTD: Prarie 10
359 VTD: Prarie 25
360 VTD: Prarie 53
361 VTD: Prarie 54
362 VTD: Prarie 55
363 VTD: Prarie 57
364 VTD: Prarie 58

HB 3487 68
365 VTD: Prarie 61
366 VTD: Prarie 63
367 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 02
368 Block: 290950193022001
369 Block: 290950193022003
370 Block: 290950193022004
371 Block: 290950193022005
372 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 03
373 Block: 290950193022017
374 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 07
375 Block: 290950148061000
376 Block: 290950148061001
377 Block: 290950149041002
378 Block: 290950149041003
379 Block: 290950149041005
380 Block: 290950149041006
381 Block: 290950149041007
382 Block: 290950149041008
383 Block: 290950149041009
384 Block: 290950149041013
385 Block: 290950149041014
386 Block: 290950149041015
387 Block: 290950149041017
388 Block: 290950149041018
389 Block: 290950149041019
390 Block: 290950149041020
391 Block: 290950149041021
392 Block: 290950149041022
393 Block: 290950149041028
394 Block: 290950149041029
395 Block: 290950149041030
396 Block: 290950149041031
397 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 08
398 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 09
399 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 10
400 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 11
401 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 12

HB 3487 69
402 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 13
403 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 14
404 Block: 290950149051001
405 Block: 290950149051016
406 Block: 290950149051017
407 Block: 290950149051018
408 Block: 290950149051019
409 Block: 290950149051020
410 Block: 290950149051021
411 Block: 290950149051025
412 Block: 290950149052003
413 Block: 290950149052016
414 Block: 290950149052017
415 Block: 290950149052018
416 Block: 290950149052019
417 Block: 290950149052020
418 Block: 290950149052021
419 Block: 290950149052022
420 Block: 290950149052025
421 Block: 290950149052029
422 Block: 290950149052030
423 Block: 290950149052031
424 Block: 290950149052032
425 Block: 290950149052033
426 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 15
427 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 16
428 Block: 290950141221006
429 Block: 290950141221007
430 Block: 290950141221021
431 Block: 290950141281001
432 Block: 290950141281002
433 Block: 290950141281003
434 Block: 290950141281004
435 Block: 290950141281005
436 Block: 290950141281008
437 Block: 290950141281009
438 Block: 290950141281010

HB 3487 70
439 Block: 290950141281017
440 Block: 290950141281018
441 Block: 290950141281019
442 Block: 290950141281020
443 Block: 290950141281024
444 Block: 290950141281025
445 Block: 290950141283000
446 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 17
447 Block: 290950148042031
448 Block: 290950193011000
449 Block: 290950193011008
450 Block: 290950193011012
451 Block: 290950193011023
452 Block: 290950193011024
453 Block: 290950193011026
454 Block: 290950193012000
455 Block: 290950193012001
456 Block: 290950193012002
457 Block: 290950193012003
458 Block: 290950193012004
459 Block: 290950193012005
460 Block: 290950193012006
461 Block: 290950193012007
462 Block: 290950193012008
463 Block: 290950193012009
464 Block: 290950193012010
465 Block: 290950193012011
466 Block: 290950193012012
467 Block: 290950193012013
468 Block: 290950193012015
469 Block: 290950193012016
470 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 18
471 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 19
472 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 20
473 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 21
474 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 22
475 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 23

HB 3487 71
476 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 24
477 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 25
478 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 26
479 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 27
480 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 28
481 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 29
482 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 30
483 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 31
484 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 32
485 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 33
486 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 34
487 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 35
488 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 36
489 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 37
490 Block: 290950140021009
491 Block: 290950140021011
492 Block: 290950140021014
493 Block: 290950140021015
494 Block: 290950140021026
495 Block: 290950140021027
496 Block: 290950140021028
497 Block: 290950140021029
498 Block: 290950140021030
499 Block: 290950140021031
500 Block: 290950140021032
501 Block: 290950140021035
502 Block: 290950140021036
503 Block: 290950140022006
504 Block: 290950140022007
505 Block: 290950140022008
506 Block: 290950140022009
507 Block: 290950140022010
508 Block: 290950140022011
509 Block: 290950140022012
510 Block: 290950140022013
511 Block: 290950140022016
512 Block: 290950140022017

HB 3487 72
513 Block: 290950140022018
514 Block: 290950140022040
515 Block: 290950140022041
516 Block: 290950140051019
517 Block: 290950140063021
518 Block: 290950140063022
519 Block: 290950140063023
520 Block: 290950140063024
521 Block: 290950140063025
522 Block: 290950141112001
523 Block: 290950141112007
524 Block: 290950141112008
525 Block: 290950141121000
526 Block: 290950141121001
527 Block: 290950141121002
528 Block: 290950141121003
529 Block: 290950141121004
530 Block: 290950141121015
531 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 45
532 Block: 290950140021019
533 Block: 290950140021020
534 Block: 290950140021022
535 Block: 290950140021023
536 Block: 290950140021024
537 Block: 290950140021025
538 Block: 290950140021033
539 Block: 290950140021034
540 Block: 290950140022003
541 Block: 290950140022004
542 Block: 290950140022005
543 Block: 290950140022024
544 Block: 290950140051035
545 Block: 290950140051036
546 Block: 290950140051037
547 Block: 290950140051039
548 Block: 290950140051040
549 Block: 290950140051041

HB 3487 73
550 Block: 290950140051042
551 Block: 290950140054015
552 Block: 290950140054016
553 Block: 290950140054017
554 Block: 290950140054018
555 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 83
556 VTD: Van Buren 01
557 VTD: Van Buren 02
558 VTD: Van Buren 03
559 VTD: Van Buren 04
560 VTD: Van Buren 06
561 VTD: Van Buren 07
562 VTD: Van Buren 08
563 VTD: Van Buren 09
564 VTD: Van Buren 10
565 VTD: Van Buren 11
566 VTD: Van Buren 12
567 VTD: Van Buren 13
568 VTD: Van Buren 14
569 VTD: Van Buren 15
570 VTD: Van Buren 16
571 VTD: Van Buren 17
572 VTD: Van Buren 18
573 VTD: Van Buren 19
574 VTD: Washington 01
575 VTD: Washington 02
576 VTD: Washington 03
577 VTD: Washington 04
578 VTD: Washington 05
579 VTD: Washington 06
580 VTD: Washington 07
581 VTD: Washington 08
582 VTD: Washington 09
583 VTD: Washington 10
584 VTD: Washington 11
585 VTD: Washington 12
586 County: Laclede MO

HB 3487 74
587 County: Polk MO
588 County: Pulaski MO
589 County: St. Clair MO
590 County: Vernon MO
591 County: Webster MO
592 VTD: East Ozark
593 VTD: Grant
594 Block: 292254701021041
595 Block: 292254701021042
596 Block: 292254701022000
597 Block: 292254701022001
598 Block: 292254701022002
599 Block: 292254701022003
600 Block: 292254701022004
601 Block: 292254701022005
602 Block: 292254701022006
603 Block: 292254701022007
604 Block: 292254701022008
605 Block: 292254701022009
606 Block: 292254701022010
607 Block: 292254701022011
608 Block: 292254701022012
609 Block: 292254701022013
610 Block: 292254701022014
611 Block: 292254701022015
612 Block: 292254701022019
613 Block: 292254701022020
614 Block: 292254701022021
615 Block: 292254701022022
616 Block: 292254701022023
617 Block: 292254701022024
618 Block: 292254701022025
619 Block: 292254701022026
620 Block: 292254701022027
621 Block: 292254701022028
622 Block: 292254701022029
623 Block: 292254701022030

HB 3487 75
624 Block: 292254701022031
625 Block: 292254701022032
626 Block: 292254701022033
627 Block: 292254701022034
628 Block: 292254701022035
629 Block: 292254701022036
630 Block: 292254701022037
631 Block: 292254701022038
632 Block: 292254701022039
633 Block: 292254701022040
634 Block: 292254701022041
635 Block: 292254701022042
636 Block: 292254701022043
637 Block: 292254701022044
638 Block: 292254701022045
639 Block: 292254701022046
640 Block: 292254701022047
641 Block: 292254701022048
642 Block: 292254701022049
643 Block: 292254701022050
644 Block: 292254701022051
645 Block: 292254701022052
646 Block: 292254701022053
647 Block: 292254701022054
648 Block: 292254701022055
649 Block: 292254701022056
650 Block: 292254701022057
651 Block: 292254701022058
652 Block: 292254701022059
653 Block: 292254701023081
654 Block: 292254701023082
655 Block: 292254701023085
656 Block: 292254701023086
657 VTD: High Prairie
658 VTD: Jackson
659 VTD: Marshfield East
660 VTD: Marshfield West

HB 3487 76
661 VTD: Niangua
662 VTD: Northview A
663 VTD: Northview B
664 Block: 292254702022011
665 Block: 292254702022012
666 Block: 292254702022013
667 Block: 292254702022016
668 Block: 292254702022019
669 Block: 292254702022020
670 Block: 292254702022021
671 Block: 292254702022022
672 Block: 292254702022023
673 Block: 292254702022024
674 Block: 292254702022025
675 Block: 292254702022037
676 Block: 292254702022038
677 Block: 292254702022039
678 Block: 292254702022040
679 Block: 292254703022009
680 Block: 292254703022011
681 Block: 292254703022012
682 Block: 292254703022013
683 Block: 292254703023000
684 Block: 292254703023001
685 Block: 292254703023002
686 Block: 292254703023003
687 Block: 292254703023004
688 Block: 292254703023005
689 Block: 292254703023006
690 Block: 292254703023014
691 Block: 292254703023015
692 Block: 292254703023016
693 Block: 292254703023017
694 Block: 292254703023018
695 Block: 292254703023019
696 Block: 292254703023020
697 Block: 292254703023021

HB 3487 77
698 Block: 292254703023022
699 Block: 292254703023023
700 Block: 292254703023024
701 Block: 292254703023025
702 Block: 292254703023026
703 Block: 292254703023027
704 Block: 292254703023028
705 Block: 292254703023029
706 Block: 292254703023031
707 Block: 292254703023034
708 VTD: Union
709 VTD: Washington
710 District 4 Total
128.485. The fifth congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Boone MO
3 VTD: 07
4 VTD: 08
5 VTD: 09
6 VTD: 10
7 VTD: 11
8 VTD: 12
9 VTD: 15
10 VTD: 16
11 VTD: 17
12 Block: 290190015031004
13 Block: 290190015031013
14 Block: 290190015062000
15 Block: 290190015062001
16 Block: 290190015062002
17 Block: 290190015062003
18 Block: 290190015062004
19 Block: 290190015062006
20 Block: 290190015062007
21 Block: 290190015062012
22 Block: 290190015062018
23 Block: 290190015062019
24 Block: 290190015062021

HB 3487 78
25 Block: 290190016031001
26 Block: 290190016031005
27 Block: 290190016031006
28 Block: 290190016031007
29 Block: 290190016031012
30 Block: 290190016031017
31 Block: 290190019031003
32 Block: 290190019031004
33 Block: 290190019031005
34 Block: 290190019031006
35 Block: 290190019031007
36 Block: 290190019031008
37 Block: 290190019031009
38 Block: 290190019031010
39 Block: 290190019031011
40 Block: 290190019031012
41 Block: 290190019031013
42 Block: 290190019031014
43 Block: 290190019031015
44 Block: 290190019031016
45 Block: 290190019031017
46 Block: 290190019031018
47 Block: 290190019031019
48 Block: 290190019031020
49 Block: 290190019031021
50 Block: 290190019031022
51 Block: 290190019031023
52 Block: 290190019031024
53 Block: 290190019032037
54 Block: 290190019032038
55 Block: 290190019032044
56 Block: 290190019032045
57 Block: 290190019032046
58 Block: 290190019032047
59 Block: 290190019032049
60 Block: 290190019033053
61 Block: 290190019033054

HB 3487 79
62 Block: 290190019033055
63 Block: 290190019033056
64 Block: 290190019033057
65 Block: 290190019033059
66 Block: 290190019033060
67 VTD: 18
68 VTD: 19
69 VTD: 20
70 VTD: 21
71 Block: 290190013003003
72 Block: 290190013003004
73 Block: 290190018061007
74 Block: 290190018071011
75 Block: 290190018071012
76 Block: 290190018071013
77 Block: 290190018071014
78 Block: 290190018071015
79 Block: 290190018071016
80 Block: 290190018071022
81 Block: 290190018071023
82 Block: 290190018071024
83 Block: 290190018071025
84 Block: 290190018071026
85 Block: 290190018071027
86 Block: 290190018071028
87 Block: 290190018072000
88 Block: 290190018072012
89 Block: 290190018072014
90 Block: 290190018072017
91 Block: 290190018072018
92 Block: 290190018072022
93 Block: 290190018072023
94 VTD: 22
95 Block: 290190014012004
96 Block: 290190014012005
97 Block: 290190014012006
98 Block: 290190014012007

HB 3487 80
99 Block: 290190014012008
100 Block: 290190014012009
101 Block: 290190014012010
102 Block: 290190014012011
103 Block: 290190014012012
104 Block: 290190014012013
105 Block: 290190014012015
106 Block: 290190014012016
107 Block: 290190014012019
108 Block: 290190014012020
109 Block: 290190014012021
110 Block: 290190014012027
111 Block: 290190014012028
112 Block: 290190014012031
113 Block: 290190014013000
114 Block: 290190014013001
115 Block: 290190014013002
116 Block: 290190014013003
117 Block: 290190014013004
118 Block: 290190014013005
119 Block: 290190014013006
120 Block: 290190014013012
121 Block: 290190014013017
122 Block: 290190014013025
123 Block: 290190014013026
124 Block: 290190014013027
125 Block: 290190014013028
126 Block: 290190014013029
127 Block: 290190014013033
128 Block: 290190014013055
129 Block: 290190018031012
130 Block: 290190018031013
131 Block: 290190018031014
132 Block: 290190018031029
133 Block: 290190018031030
134 VTD: 2K
135 Block: 290190018072001

HB 3487 81
136 Block: 290190018072002
137 Block: 290190018072003
138 Block: 290190018072004
139 Block: 290190018072005
140 Block: 290190018072006
141 Block: 290190018072007
142 Block: 290190018072008
143 Block: 290190018072010
144 VTD: 37
145 Block: 290190017021039
146 Block: 290190017021040
147 Block: 290190018062032
148 Block: 290190018062034
149 Block: 290190018062039
150 Block: 290190018062040
151 Block: 290190018062041
152 Block: 290190018062042
153 Block: 290190018062043
154 Block: 290190018062045
155 VTD: 38
156 VTD: 39
157 VTD: 40
158 Block: 290190015031005
159 Block: 290190015031006
160 Block: 290190015031007
161 Block: 290190015031008
162 Block: 290190015031009
163 Block: 290190015031021
164 Block: 290190015031022
165 Block: 290190015031026
166 Block: 290190015033000
167 Block: 290190015033001
168 Block: 290190015033002
169 Block: 290190015033003
170 Block: 290190015033004
171 Block: 290190015033005
172 Block: 290190015033009

HB 3487 82
173 Block: 290190015033010
174 Block: 290190015033011
175 Block: 290190015033013
176 Block: 290190015033015
177 Block: 290190015033017
178 Block: 290190015033018
179 Block: 290190015033019
180 Block: 290190015033020
181 Block: 290190015033021
182 Block: 290190015033023
183 Block: 290190015033024
184 Block: 290190015033031
185 Block: 290190015033053
186 Block: 290190015033054
187 Block: 290190015033055
188 Block: 290190019032050
189 Block: 290190019032051
190 Block: 290190019032054
191 VTD: 45
192 Block: 290190015031023
193 Block: 290190015031024
194 Block: 290190015031025
195 Block: 290190015031027
196 Block: 290190015031028
197 Block: 290190015031029
198 Block: 290190015031030
199 Block: 290190015031031
200 Block: 290190015032015
201 Block: 290190015033027
202 Block: 290190015033029
203 Block: 290190015033032
204 Block: 290190015033049
205 Block: 290190015033050
206 Block: 290190015033051
207 Block: 290190015033056
208 Block: 290190015033057
209 Block: 290190015033058

HB 3487 83
210 Block: 290190015081000
211 Block: 290190015081001
212 VTD: 4B
213 Block: 290190018071000
214 Block: 290190018071001
215 Block: 290190018071002
216 Block: 290190018071003
217 Block: 290190018071004
218 Block: 290190018071005
219 Block: 290190018071006
220 Block: 290190018071007
221 Block: 290190018071008
222 Block: 290190018071009
223 Block: 290190018071010
224 Block: 290190018072009
225 Block: 290190018072011
226 Block: 290190018072013
227 Block: 290190018072016
228 Block: 290190018072019
229 Block: 290190018072020
230 Block: 290190018072021
231 Block: 290190018072026
232 VTD: 4L
233 Block: 290190018072015
234 County: Carroll MO
235 County: Chariton MO
236 County: Cole MO
237 County: Cooper MO
238 County: Howard MO
239 County: Jackson MO
240 VTD: 1603
241 VTD: Blue 01-01
242 VTD: Blue 01-02
243 Block: 290950110021000
244 Block: 290950110021001
245 Block: 290950110021002
246 Block: 290950110021003

HB 3487 84
247 Block: 290950110021004
248 Block: 290950110021005
249 Block: 290950110021006
250 Block: 290950110021007
251 Block: 290950110021008
252 Block: 290950110021009
253 Block: 290950110021010
254 Block: 290950110021011
255 Block: 290950110021012
256 Block: 290950110021013
257 Block: 290950110021014
258 Block: 290950110021015
259 Block: 290950110021016
260 Block: 290950110021017
261 Block: 290950110021018
262 Block: 290950110021019
263 Block: 290950110021020
264 Block: 290950110021021
265 Block: 290950110021022
266 Block: 290950110021023
267 Block: 290950110021024
268 Block: 290950110021025
269 Block: 290950110021026
270 Block: 290950110021027
271 Block: 290950110021028
272 Block: 290950110021029
273 Block: 290950110021030
274 Block: 290950110022001
275 Block: 290950110022002
276 Block: 290950110022003
277 Block: 290950110022004
278 Block: 290950110022005
279 Block: 290950110022006
280 Block: 290950110022007
281 Block: 290950110022011
282 Block: 290950110022012
283 Block: 290950110022016

HB 3487 85
284 Block: 290950110022017
285 Block: 290950110022018
286 Block: 290950118001005
287 Block: 290950118001006
288 Block: 290950156002010
289 Block: 290950156002011
290 Block: 290950156002012
291 Block: 290950156002013
292 Block: 290950156003007
293 Block: 290950156003008
294 Block: 290950156003009
295 Block: 290950156003010
296 Block: 290950156003011
297 Block: 290950156003012
298 Block: 290950156003013
299 Block: 290950156003014
300 Block: 290950156003015
301 Block: 290950156003016
302 Block: 290950156003017
303 Block: 290950156003018
304 Block: 290950156003019
305 Block: 290950156003020
306 Block: 290950156003021
307 Block: 290950156003022
308 VTD: Blue 01-03
309 VTD: Blue 01-04
310 VTD: Blue 01-05
311 VTD: Blue 01-06
312 VTD: Blue 01-07
313 VTD: Blue 01-08
314 VTD: Blue 01-09
315 VTD: Blue 02-01
316 VTD: Blue 02-02
317 VTD: Blue 02-03
318 VTD: Blue 02-04
319 VTD: Blue 02-05
320 VTD: Blue 02-06

HB 3487 86
321 VTD: Blue 02-07
322 VTD: Blue 03-01
323 VTD: Blue 03-02
324 VTD: Blue 03-03
325 VTD: Blue 03-04
326 VTD: Blue 03-05
327 VTD: Blue 03-06
328 VTD: Blue 03-07
329 VTD: Blue 03-08
330 VTD: Blue 03-09
331 VTD: Blue 04-01
332 VTD: Blue 04-02
333 VTD: Blue 04-03
334 VTD: Blue 04-04
335 VTD: Blue 04-05
336 VTD: Blue 04-06
337 VTD: Blue 04-07
338 VTD: Blue 04-08
339 VTD: Blue 04-09
340 VTD: Blue 04-10
341 VTD: Blue 05-01
342 VTD: Blue 05-02
343 VTD: Blue 05-03
344 VTD: Blue 05-04
345 VTD: Blue 05-05
346 VTD: Blue 05-06
347 VTD: Blue 05-07
348 VTD: Blue 05-08
349 VTD: Blue 05-09
350 VTD: Blue 06-01
351 VTD: Blue 06-02
352 VTD: Blue 06-03
353 VTD: Blue 06-04
354 VTD: Blue 06-05
355 VTD: Blue 06-06
356 VTD: Blue 06-07
357 VTD: Blue 07-01

HB 3487 87
358 VTD: Blue 07-02
359 VTD: Blue 07-03
360 VTD: Blue 07-04
361 VTD: Blue 07-05
362 VTD: Blue 07-06
363 VTD: Blue 07-07
364 VTD: Blue 07-08
365 VTD: Blue 07-09
366 VTD: Blue 08-01
367 VTD: Blue 08-02
368 VTD: Blue 08-03
369 VTD: Blue 08-04
370 VTD: Blue 08-05
371 VTD: Blue 08-06
372 VTD: Blue 08-07
373 VTD: Blue 08-08
374 VTD: Brooking No. 1
375 VTD: Brooking No. 10
376 VTD: Brooking No. 11
377 VTD: Brooking No. 12
378 VTD: Brooking No. 13
379 VTD: Brooking No. 14
380 VTD: Brooking No. 15
381 VTD: Brooking No. 16
382 VTD: Brooking No. 17
383 VTD: Brooking No. 18
384 VTD: Brooking No. 19
385 VTD: Brooking No. 2
386 VTD: Brooking No. 20
387 VTD: Brooking No. 3
388 VTD: Brooking No. 4
389 VTD: Brooking No. 5
390 VTD: Brooking No. 6
391 VTD: Brooking No. 7
392 VTD: Brooking No. 8
393 VTD: Brooking No. 9
394 VTD: Fort Osage 01

HB 3487 88
395 VTD: Fort Osage 02
396 VTD: Fort Osage 03
397 VTD: Fort Osage 04
398 VTD: Fort Osage 05
399 VTD: Fort Osage 06
400 VTD: Fort Osage 07
401 VTD: Fort Osage 08
402 VTD: Fort Osage 09
403 VTD: Fort Osage 10
404 VTD: KC 1004
405 Block: 290950100021000
406 Block: 290950100021001
407 Block: 290950100021002
408 Block: 290950100021009
409 Block: 290950100021010
410 Block: 290950100021011
411 VTD: KC 1008
412 Block: 290950100022005
413 Block: 290950100022006
414 Block: 290950100022007
415 Block: 290950100022009
416 Block: 290950100022010
417 VTD: KC 1009
418 Block: 290950100022000
419 Block: 290950100022001
420 VTD: KC 1303
421 VTD: KC 1304
422 VTD: KC 1309
423 Block: 290950156001018
424 VTD: KC 1313
425 VTD: KC 1401
426 VTD: KC 1402
427 VTD: KC 1403
428 VTD: KC 1404
429 VTD: KC 1405
430 VTD: KC 1406
431 VTD: KC 1407

HB 3487 89
432 VTD: KC 1408
433 VTD: KC 1409
434 VTD: KC 1410
435 VTD: KC 1411
436 VTD: KC 1412
437 VTD: KC 1413
438 VTD: KC 1414
439 VTD: KC 1415
440 VTD: KC 1501
441 VTD: KC 1502
442 VTD: KC 1503
443 VTD: KC 1504
444 VTD: KC 1505
445 VTD: KC 1506
446 VTD: KC 1507
447 VTD: KC 1508
448 VTD: KC 1509
449 VTD: KC 1510
450 VTD: KC 1511
451 VTD: KC 1512
452 VTD: KC 1513
453 VTD: KC 1514
454 VTD: KC 1515
455 VTD: KC 1516
456 VTD: KC 1517
457 VTD: KC 1518
458 VTD: KC 1519
459 VTD: KC 1520
460 VTD: KC 1521
461 VTD: KC 1522
462 VTD: KC 1523
463 VTD: KC 1524
464 VTD: KC 1601
465 VTD: KC 1602
466 VTD: KC 1604
467 VTD: KC 1605
468 VTD: KC 1606

HB 3487 90
469 VTD: KC 1607
470 VTD: KC 1608
471 VTD: KC 1609
472 VTD: KC 1610
473 VTD: KC 1611
474 VTD: KC 1612
475 VTD: KC 1613
476 VTD: KC 1614
477 VTD: KC 1615
478 VTD: KC 1701
479 VTD: KC 1702
480 VTD: KC 1703
481 VTD: KC 1704
482 VTD: KC 1705
483 VTD: KC 1706
484 VTD: KC 1707
485 VTD: KC 1708
486 VTD: KC 1709
487 VTD: KC 1710
488 VTD: KC 1711
489 VTD: KC 1712
490 VTD: KC 1713
491 VTD: KC 1714
492 VTD: KC 1801
493 VTD: KC 1802
494 VTD: KC 1803
495 VTD: KC 1804
496 VTD: KC 1805
497 VTD: KC 1806
498 VTD: KC 1807
499 VTD: KC 1808
500 VTD: KC 1809
501 VTD: KC 1810
502 VTD: KC 1811
503 VTD: KC 1812
504 VTD: KC 1813
505 VTD: KC 1814

HB 3487 91
506 VTD: KC 1815
507 VTD: KC 1816
508 VTD: KC 1901
509 VTD: KC 1902
510 VTD: KC 1903
511 VTD: KC 1904
512 VTD: KC 1905
513 VTD: KC 1906
514 VTD: KC 1907
515 VTD: KC 1908
516 VTD: KC 1909
517 VTD: KC 1910
518 VTD: KC 1911
519 VTD: KC 1912
520 VTD: KC 1913
521 VTD: KC 1914
522 VTD: KC 1915
523 VTD: KC 1917
524 VTD: KC 1918
525 VTD: KC 1920
526 VTD: KC 1921
527 VTD: KC 1922
528 VTD: KC 1923
529 VTD: KC 2001
530 Block: 290950132082004
531 Block: 290950132082005
532 Block: 290950132082006
533 VTD: KC 203
534 Block: 290950154012030
535 Block: 290950154012031
536 Block: 290950154012032
537 Block: 290950154012033
538 Block: 290950154012034
539 Block: 290950154012039
540 Block: 290950154012040
541 Block: 290950154012041
542 Block: 290950154012042

HB 3487 92
543 Block: 290950154012046
544 Block: 290950154012047
545 Block: 290950154012054
546 Block: 290950154012055
547 Block: 290950154012056
548 Block: 290950154012057
549 Block: 290950154013011
550 Block: 290950154013012
551 Block: 290950154013013
552 Block: 290950154013014
553 Block: 290950154013015
554 Block: 290950161002000
555 Block: 290950161002001
556 Block: 290950161002002
557 Block: 290950161002003
558 Block: 290950161002004
559 Block: 290950161002005
560 Block: 290950161002006
561 Block: 290950161002007
562 Block: 290950161002008
563 Block: 290950161002009
564 Block: 290950161002010
565 Block: 290950161002011
566 Block: 290950161002012
567 Block: 290950161002013
568 Block: 290950161002014
569 Block: 290950161002015
570 Block: 290950161002016
571 Block: 290950161002017
572 VTD: KC 204
573 VTD: KC 207
574 VTD: KC 209
575 VTD: KC 210
576 VTD: KC 212
577 Block: 290950161001012
578 Block: 290950161001013
579 Block: 290950161001014

HB 3487 93
580 Block: 290950161001015
581 Block: 290950161001028
582 Block: 290950161001029
583 Block: 290950161002034
584 Block: 290950161002035
585 Block: 290950161002038
586 Block: 290950161002039
587 Block: 290950161002068
588 VTD: KC 213
589 Block: 290950023001010
590 Block: 290950023001011
591 Block: 290950023001013
592 Block: 290950023001014
593 VTD: KC 214
594 VTD: KC 215
595 VTD: KC 218
596 Block: 290950154012043
597 Block: 290950154012048
598 Block: 290950154012051
599 Block: 290950154012052
600 Block: 290950154012053
601 Block: 290950161002031
602 Block: 290950161002036
603 Block: 290950161002037
604 Block: 290950161002041
605 VTD: KC 2301
606 VTD: KC 2302
607 VTD: KC 2303
608 VTD: KC 2304
609 VTD: KC 2305
610 VTD: KC 2306
611 VTD: KC 2307
612 VTD: KC 2308
613 VTD: KC 2309
614 VTD: KC 2310
615 VTD: KC 2311
616 VTD: KC 2312

HB 3487 94
617 VTD: KC 2313
618 VTD: KC 2314
619 VTD: KC 2315
620 VTD: KC 2316
621 VTD: KC 2401
622 VTD: KC 2402
623 VTD: KC 2403
624 VTD: KC 2404
625 VTD: KC 2405
626 VTD: KC 2406
627 VTD: KC 2407
628 VTD: KC 2408
629 VTD: KC 2409
630 VTD: KC 2410
631 VTD: KC 2411
632 VTD: KC 2412
633 VTD: KC 2413
634 VTD: KC 2414
635 VTD: KC 2415
636 VTD: KC 2416
637 VTD: KC 2417
638 VTD: KC 2418
639 VTD: KC 2419
640 VTD: KC 2420
641 VTD: KC 2421
642 VTD: KC 2422
643 VTD: KC 2423
644 VTD: KC 2424
645 VTD: KC 2425
646 VTD: KC 2426
647 VTD: KC 2427
648 VTD: KC 2428
649 VTD: KC 2429
650 VTD: KC 2430
651 VTD: KC 2431
652 VTD: KC 2501
653 VTD: KC 2503

HB 3487 95
654 Block: 290950129064013
655 Block: 290950129064014
656 Block: 290950132081009
657 Block: 290950132101000
658 Block: 290950132101001
659 Block: 290950132101004
660 Block: 290950132101005
661 Block: 290950132101008
662 Block: 290950132101009
663 Block: 290950132101010
664 Block: 290950144001046
665 Block: 290950144001047
666 Block: 290950144001048
667 Block: 290950144001049
668 Block: 290950144001050
669 Block: 290950144001051
670 Block: 290950144001054
671 Block: 290959883001000
672 Block: 290959883001001
673 Block: 290959883001002
674 Block: 290959883001003
675 Block: 290959883001005
676 Block: 290959883001006
677 Block: 290959883001009
678 Block: 290959883001010
679 Block: 290959883001033
680 VTD: KC 2504
681 VTD: KC 2505
682 VTD: KC 2506
683 VTD: KC 2507
684 VTD: KC 2508
685 Block: 290950131001010
686 Block: 290950132033004
687 Block: 290950132033005
688 Block: 290950132034003
689 Block: 290950132034004
690 Block: 290950132034005

HB 3487 96
691 Block: 290950132034006
692 Block: 290950132034007
693 Block: 290950132034008
694 Block: 290950132034009
695 Block: 290950132034010
696 Block: 290950132034011
697 Block: 290950132034012
698 Block: 290950132034013
699 Block: 290950132034014
700 Block: 290950132082000
701 Block: 290950132082001
702 Block: 290950132082002
703 Block: 290950132082003
704 Block: 290950132082017
705 VTD: KC 2509
706 VTD: KC 2513
707 VTD: KC 2514
708 VTD: KC 2601
709 VTD: KC 2602
710 VTD: KC 2603
711 VTD: KC 2604
712 VTD: KC 2605
713 VTD: KC 2606
714 VTD: KC 2607
715 VTD: KC 2608
716 VTD: KC 2609
717 VTD: KC 2610
718 VTD: KC 2611
719 VTD: KC 2612
720 VTD: KC 2613
721 VTD: KC 301
722 VTD: KC 302
723 VTD: KC 303
724 VTD: KC 304
725 VTD: KC 305
726 VTD: KC 306
727 VTD: KC 307

HB 3487 97
728 VTD: KC 308
729 VTD: KC 309
730 VTD: KC 310
731 VTD: KC 311
732 VTD: KC 312
733 VTD: KC 313
734 VTD: KC 314
735 VTD: KC 315
736 VTD: KC 316
737 VTD: KC 317
738 VTD: KC 318
739 VTD: KC 701
740 VTD: KC 702
741 VTD: KC 703
742 VTD: KC 704
743 VTD: KC 705
744 VTD: KC 706
745 VTD: KC 707
746 VTD: KC 708
747 VTD: KC 709
748 VTD: KC 710
749 VTD: KC 711
750 VTD: KC 712
751 VTD: KC 713
752 VTD: KC 714
753 VTD: KC 715
754 VTD: KC 716
755 VTD: KC 717
756 VTD: KC 718
757 VTD: KC 809
758 Block: 290950086001010
759 Block: 290950086001011
760 Block: 290950086001012
761 Block: 290950086001013
762 VTD: KC 811
763 VTD: KC 905
764 VTD: KC 913

HB 3487 98
765 VTD: KC WD13 PCT1302
766 Block: 290950021003008
767 VTD: KC WD2 PCT205
768 VTD: KC WD2 PCT206
769 VTD: KC WD2 PCT211
770 Block: 290950018003010
771 Block: 290950018003017
772 Block: 290950018003018
773 Block: 290950018003019
774 Block: 290950160001008
775 Block: 290950160001009
776 Block: 290950160001010
777 Block: 290950160001011
778 Block: 290950160001012
779 Block: 290950160001013
780 Block: 290950160001014
781 Block: 290950160001029
782 Block: 290950160001030
783 Block: 290950160001032
784 Block: 290950160001033
785 Block: 290950160001034
786 Block: 290950160001035
787 Block: 290950160001036
788 Block: 290950160001037
789 Block: 290950160001038
790 Block: 290950160001039
791 Block: 290950160001052
792 VTD: KC1314
793 VTD: Prarie 01
794 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 01
795 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 02
796 Block: 290950145031003
797 Block: 290950145031004
798 Block: 290950145031013
799 Block: 290950145031014
800 Block: 290950193012014
801 Block: 290950193022000

HB 3487 99
802 Block: 290950193022009
803 Block: 290950193022010
804 Block: 290950193022011
805 Block: 290950193022019
806 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 03
807 Block: 290950193022006
808 Block: 290950193022007
809 Block: 290950193022008
810 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 04
811 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 05
812 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 06
813 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 07
814 Block: 290950148041042
815 Block: 290950148041043
816 Block: 290950148041044
817 Block: 290950149033024
818 Block: 290950149033025
819 Block: 290950149033026
820 Block: 290950149033027
821 Block: 290950149033028
822 Block: 290950149041000
823 Block: 290950149041001
824 Block: 290950149041004
825 Block: 290950149041010
826 Block: 290950149041011
827 Block: 290950149041012
828 Block: 290950149052005
829 Block: 290950149052006
830 Block: 290950149054000
831 Block: 290950149054001
832 Block: 290950149054011
833 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 14
834 Block: 290950140091012
835 Block: 290950149051000
836 Block: 290950149051022
837 Block: 290950149052014
838 Block: 290950149052015

HB 3487 100
839 Block: 290950149052026
840 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 16
841 Block: 290950140083002
842 Block: 290950141221004
843 Block: 290950141221005
844 Block: 290950141221010
845 Block: 290950141281026
846 Block: 290950141281027
847 Block: 290950141281029
848 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 17
849 Block: 290950145031000
850 Block: 290950145031005
851 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 37
852 Block: 290950140021004
853 Block: 290950140021005
854 Block: 290950140021008
855 Block: 290950140021010
856 Block: 290950140021012
857 Block: 290950140021013
858 Block: 290950140021016
859 Block: 290950140063005
860 Block: 290950140063007
861 Block: 290950140063013
862 Block: 290950140063019
863 Block: 290950140063020
864 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 38
865 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 39
866 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 40
867 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 41
868 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 42
869 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 43
870 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 44
871 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 45
872 Block: 290950140021021
873 Block: 290950140051020
874 Block: 290950140051021
875 Block: 290950140051022

HB 3487 101
876 Block: 290950140051023
877 Block: 290950140051024
878 Block: 290950140051025
879 Block: 290950140051026
880 Block: 290950140051029
881 Block: 290950140051030
882 Block: 290950140051031
883 Block: 290950140051032
884 Block: 290950140051033
885 Block: 290950140051034
886 Block: 290950140051038
887 Block: 290950140051043
888 Block: 290950140051044
889 Block: 290950140054011
890 Block: 290950140054012
891 Block: 290950140054013
892 Block: 290950140054014
893 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 46
894 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 47
895 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 48
896 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 49
897 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 50
898 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 51
899 VTD: Sni-A-Bar 52
900 County: Johnson MO
901 County: Lafayette MO
902 County: Maries MO
903 County: Miller MO
904 County: Moniteau MO
905 County: Morgan MO
906 County: Osage MO
907 County: Pettis MO
908 County: Randolph MO
909 County: Saline MO
910 District 5 Total
128.486. The sixth congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Adair MO

HB 3487 102
3 County: Andrew MO
4 County: Atchison MO
5 County: Buchanan MO
6 County: Caldwell MO
7 County: Clark MO
8 County: Clay MO
9 County: Clinton MO
10 County: Daviess MO
11 County: DeKalb MO
12 County: Gentry MO
13 County: Grundy MO
14 County: Harrison MO
15 County: Holt MO
16 County: Jackson MO
17 VTD: Blue 01-02
18 Block: 290950156001000
19 Block: 290950156001005
20 VTD: KC 1101
21 Block: 290950003001001
22 Block: 290950003001002
23 Block: 290950003001003
24 Block: 290950003001004
25 Block: 290950003001006
26 Block: 290950003001007
27 Block: 290950003002001
28 Block: 290950003002002
29 Block: 290950003002006
30 Block: 290950003002007
31 Block: 290950003002008
32 Block: 290950003002009
33 Block: 290950003002010
34 Block: 290950003002011
35 Block: 290950003003000
36 Block: 290950003003001
37 Block: 290950003003002
38 Block: 290950003003003
39 Block: 290950003003004

HB 3487 103
40 Block: 290950003003005
41 Block: 290950003003006
42 Block: 290950003003007
43 Block: 290950003003008
44 Block: 290950003003009
45 Block: 290950003003012
46 Block: 290950003003013
47 Block: 290950003003014
48 Block: 290950003003017
49 Block: 290950003003018
50 Block: 290950003003019
51 Block: 290950003003020
52 Block: 290950003003021
53 Block: 290950003003024
54 Block: 290950003003027
55 VTD: KC 1102
56 VTD: KC 1103
57 VTD: KC 1104
58 VTD: KC 1105
59 VTD: KC 1106
60 VTD: KC 1107
61 VTD: KC 1109
62 VTD: KC 1110
63 VTD: KC 1111
64 VTD: KC 1113
65 VTD: KC 1114
66 VTD: KC 1201
67 VTD: KC 1202
68 VTD: KC 1203
69 VTD: KC 1204
70 VTD: KC 1205
71 VTD: KC 1206
72 VTD: KC 1207
73 VTD: KC 1208
74 VTD: KC 1209
75 VTD: KC 1210
76 VTD: KC 1211

HB 3487 104
77 VTD: KC 1212
78 VTD: KC 1301
79 VTD: KC 1305
80 VTD: KC 1306
81 VTD: KC 1307
82 VTD: KC 1308
83 VTD: KC 1309
84 Block: 290950021002000
85 Block: 290950155003019
86 Block: 290950155003020
87 Block: 290950155003022
88 Block: 290950155003026
89 Block: 290950155003027
90 VTD: KC 1310
91 VTD: KC 1311
92 VTD: KC 1312
93 VTD: KC 213
94 Block: 290950019003000
95 Block: 290950019003001
96 Block: 290950019003002
97 Block: 290950019003003
98 Block: 290950019003004
99 Block: 290950019003005
100 Block: 290950019003006
101 Block: 290950019003007
102 Block: 290950019003008
103 Block: 290950019003009
104 Block: 290950019003010
105 Block: 290950019003011
106 Block: 290950019003012
107 Block: 290950019003013
108 Block: 290950019003014
109 Block: 290950019003015
110 Block: 290950019003016
111 Block: 290950019003017
112 Block: 290950019003018
113 Block: 290950023001000

HB 3487 105
114 Block: 290950023001001
115 Block: 290950023001002
116 Block: 290950023001003
117 Block: 290950023001004
118 Block: 290950023001005
119 Block: 290950023001006
120 Block: 290950023001007
121 Block: 290950023001008
122 Block: 290950023001009
123 VTD: KC 216
124 VTD: KC WD13 PCT1302
125 Block: 290950021002001
126 Block: 290950021002002
127 Block: 290950021002003
128 Block: 290950021002004
129 Block: 290950021002005
130 Block: 290950021002006
131 Block: 290950021002007
132 Block: 290950021002016
133 Block: 290950021003000
134 Block: 290950021003001
135 Block: 290950021003002
136 Block: 290950021003003
137 Block: 290950021003004
138 Block: 290950021003005
139 Block: 290950021003006
140 Block: 290950021003007
141 Block: 290950021003009
142 Block: 290950021005000
143 Block: 290950021005001
144 Block: 290950021005002
145 Block: 290950021005003
146 Block: 290950021005004
147 Block: 290950021005005
148 Block: 290950021005006
149 Block: 290950021005007
150 Block: 290950021005008

HB 3487 106
151 Block: 290950021005009
152 Block: 290950021005010
153 Block: 290950021005011
154 Block: 290950021005012
155 Block: 290950021005013
156 Block: 290950021005014
157 Block: 290950021005015
158 Block: 290950021005016
159 VTD: KC WD2 PCT211
160 Block: 290950018003015
161 Block: 290950018003016
162 Block: 290950018004000
163 Block: 290950018004001
164 Block: 290950018004002
165 Block: 290950018004005
166 Block: 290950018004006
167 Block: 290950018004007
168 Block: 290950018004008
169 Block: 290950018004009
170 Block: 290950018004010
171 Block: 290950018004011
172 Block: 290950018004012
173 Block: 290950018004013
174 Block: 290950018004014
175 Block: 290950018004015
176 Block: 290950160001000
177 Block: 290950160001001
178 Block: 290950160001002
179 Block: 290950160001003
180 Block: 290950160001004
181 Block: 290950160001005
182 Block: 290950160001006
183 Block: 290950160001007
184 Block: 290950160001015
185 Block: 290950160001016
186 Block: 290950160001017
187 Block: 290950160001018

HB 3487 107
188 Block: 290950160001019
189 Block: 290950160001020
190 Block: 290950160001021
191 Block: 290950160001022
192 Block: 290950160001023
193 Block: 290950160001024
194 Block: 290950160001025
195 Block: 290950160001028
196 Block: 290950160001051
197 County: Knox MO
198 County: Lewis MO
199 County: Linn MO
200 County: Livingston MO
201 County: Macon MO
202 County: Marion MO
203 County: Mercer MO
204 County: Nodaway MO
205 County: Platte MO
206 County: Putnam MO
207 County: Ray MO
208 County: Schuyler MO
209 County: Scotland MO
210 County: Shelby MO
211 County: Sullivan MO
212 County: Worth MO
213 District 6 Total
128.487. The seventh congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Barry MO
3 County: Christian MO
4 County: Greene MO
5 County: Jasper MO
6 County: Lawrence MO
7 County: McDonald MO
8 County: Newton MO
9 County: Stone MO
10 County: Taney MO
11 County: Webster MO

HB 3487 108
12 VTD: Benton
13 VTD: Diggins
14 VTD: Finley
15 VTD: Fordland
16 VTD: Grant
17 Block: 292254701022060
18 Block: 292254701022061
19 Block: 292254701022062
20 VTD: Hazelwood
21 VTD: Northview B
22 Block: 292254703022008
23 Block: 292254703022014
24 Block: 292254703022030
25 Block: 292254703022031
26 Block: 292254703022032
27 Block: 292254703022033
28 Block: 292254703022034
29 Block: 292254703022035
30 Block: 292254703023007
31 Block: 292254703023008
32 Block: 292254703023009
33 Block: 292254703023010
34 Block: 292254703023011
35 Block: 292254703023012
36 Block: 292254703023013
37 Block: 292254703023030
38 Block: 292254703023032
39 Block: 292254703023035
40 Block: 292254703023036
41 Block: 292254703023037
42 Block: 292254703023038
43 Block: 292254703023039
44 Block: 292254703023040
45 Block: 292254703023041
46 Block: 292254703023042
47 Block: 292254703023046
48 Block: 292254703023047

HB 3487 109
49 Block: 292254703023048
50 Block: 292254703023049
51 Block: 292254703023050
52 Block: 292254703023051
53 Block: 292254703023052
54 Block: 292254703023053
55 Block: 292254703023054
56 Block: 292254703023055
57 Block: 292254703023062
58 Block: 292254703023063
59 Block: 292254703023069
60 Block: 292254703023074
61 Block: 292254703023079
62 District 7 Total
128.488. The eighth congressional district shall be composed of the following:
2 County: Bollinger MO
3 County: Butler MO
4 County: Cape Girardeau MO
5 County: Carter MO
6 County: Dent MO
7 County: Douglas MO
8 County: Dunklin MO
9 County: Howell MO
10 County: Iron MO
11 County: Jefferson MO
12 VTD: Airport
13 VTD: American Legion
14 VTD: Antonia
15 VTD: Arnold W-1
16 VTD: Arnold W-2
17 VTD: Arnold W-3
18 VTD: Arnold W-4
19 VTD: Athena
20 VTD: Barnhart
21 VTD: Brennan
22 Block: 290997002101000
23 Block: 290997002101015

HB 3487 110
24 Block: 290997002111000
25 Block: 290997002111001
26 Block: 290997002111002
27 Block: 290997002111005
28 Block: 290997002111006
29 Block: 290997002111007
30 Block: 290997002111008
31 Block: 290997002111010
32 Block: 290997002111011
33 Block: 290997003031000
34 Block: 290997003031001
35 Block: 290997003031002
36 Block: 290997003031003
37 Block: 290997003031004
38 Block: 290997003031005
39 Block: 290997003031006
40 Block: 290997003031007
41 Block: 290997003031008
42 Block: 290997003031009
43 Block: 290997003031010
44 Block: 290997003031011
45 Block: 290997003031012
46 Block: 290997003031013
47 Block: 290997003031014
48 Block: 290997003031015
49 Block: 290997003031016
50 Block: 290997003032000
51 Block: 290997003032001
52 Block: 290997003032002
53 Block: 290997003032003
54 Block: 290997003032004
55 Block: 290997003032005
56 Block: 290997003032006
57 Block: 290997003032007
58 Block: 290997003032008
59 Block: 290997003032009
60 Block: 290997003032010

HB 3487 111
61 Block: 290997003032011
62 Block: 290997003032012
63 Block: 290997003032013
64 Block: 290997003032014
65 Block: 290997003032015
66 Block: 290997003033000
67 Block: 290997003033001
68 Block: 290997003033002
69 Block: 290997003033003
70 Block: 290997003033004
71 Block: 290997003033005
72 Block: 290997003033006
73 Block: 290997003033007
74 Block: 290997003033008
75 Block: 290997003033009
76 Block: 290997003033010
77 Block: 290997003033011
78 Block: 290997003033012
79 Block: 290997003033013
80 Block: 290997003033014
81 Block: 290997003033015
82 Block: 290997003033016
83 Block: 290997003033017
84 Block: 290997003033018
85 Block: 290997003033019
86 Block: 290997003051000
87 Block: 290997003052000
88 Block: 290997003052026
89 VTD: Crystal City W-1
90 VTD: Crystal City W-2
91 VTD: Crystal City W-3
92 VTD: Crystal City W-4
93 VTD: Festus Outside
94 VTD: Festus W-1
95 VTD: Festus W-2
96 VTD: Festus W-3
97 VTD: Festus W-4

HB 3487 112
98 VTD: Flamm City
99 VTD: Hematite
100 VTD: Herculaneum
101 VTD: Herculaneum W-2
102 VTD: Herculaneum W-3
103 VTD: Imperial
104 VTD: Imperial 2
105 VTD: Jefferson Heights
106 VTD: Jefferson R7
107 VTD: Kimmswick W-1
108 VTD: Lonedell
109 VTD: Mapaville
110 VTD: Marble Springs
111 VTD: Mastodon
112 VTD: Maxville
113 VTD: Meramec Heights
114 VTD: Miller
115 VTD: Murphy
116 VTD: North Jefferson
117 Block: 290997002112008
118 Block: 290997002112009
119 Block: 290997002112010
120 Block: 290997002112011
121 Block: 290997002112012
122 Block: 290997002112013
123 Block: 290997002112014
124 Block: 290997002112015
125 Block: 290997002112016
126 VTD: Oakvale
127 VTD: Olympian Village
128 VTD: Otto
129 VTD: Pevely W-1
130 VTD: Pevely W-2
131 VTD: Pevely W-3
132 VTD: Pevely W-4
133 VTD: Plattin
134 VTD: Riverview

HB 3487 113
135 VTD: Rock Creek
136 VTD: Rock Creek 1
137 VTD: Romaine Creek
138 VTD: Saline
139 VTD: Springdale
140 VTD: Sunrise
141 VTD: Valle
142 Block: 290997013002004
143 Block: 290997013002005
144 Block: 290997013002006
145 Block: 290997013003000
146 Block: 290997013003001
147 Block: 290997013003002
148 Block: 290997013003012
149 Block: 290997013003026
150 Block: 290997014012007
151 Block: 290997014012012
152 VTD: Victoria
153 Block: 290997010021006
154 Block: 290997010021008
155 Block: 290997010021019
156 Block: 290997010021021
157 Block: 290997010023004
158 Block: 290997010023005
159 Block: 290997010023006
160 Block: 290997010023012
161 Block: 290997010023013
162 Block: 290997010023029
163 Block: 290997010023030
164 Block: 290997010023035
165 VTD: Windsor
166 County: Madison MO
167 County: Mississippi MO
168 County: New Madrid MO
169 County: Oregon MO
170 County: Ozark MO
171 County: Pemiscot MO

HB 3487 114
172 County: Perry MO
173 County: Phelps MO
174 County: Reynolds MO
175 County: Ripley MO
176 County: Scott MO
177 County: Shannon MO
178 County: St. Francois MO
179 County: Ste. Genevieve MO
180 County: Stoddard MO
181 County: Texas MO
182 County: Wayne MO
183 County: Wright MO
184 District 8 Total
✔